Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB50.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 391.010 is amended to read as follows:
When a person having right or title to any real estate or inheritance dies intestate as to such estate, it shall descend in
common to his or her kindred, male and female, in the following order, except as otherwise provided in this chapter:
(1) (a) To his or her surviving spouse as follows:
1. If there is no surviving descendant of the decedent, the entirety;
2. If the decedent is survived by one (1) or more descendants, all of whom are also descendants
of the surviving spouse, the entirety;
3. If the decedent is survived by one (1) or more descendants who are not lineal descendants of
the surviving spouse, one-half (1/2); or
4. If the decedent is survived by one (1) or more descendants, all of whom are also descendants
of the surviving spouse, and the surviving spouse has one (1) or more descendants who are not
descendants of the decedent, one-half (1/2); and
(b) Any interest in property not passing to his or her surviving spouse under this subsection, or if there is
no surviving spouse, as provided in subsections (2) to (6) of this section.
(2)[(1)] To his or her children and their descendants; if there are none, then
(3)[(2)] To his or her father and mother, if both are living, one (1) moiety each; but if the father is dead, the
mother, if living, shall take the whole estate; if the mother is dead, the whole estate shall pass to the father; if
there is no father or mother, then
(4)[(3)] To his or her brothers and sisters and their descendants; if there are none, then
[(4) To the husband or wife of the intestate; if there are none surviving, then]
(5) (a) One (1) moiety of the estate shall pass to the paternal and the other to the maternal[ kindred, in the
following order:
(a) The] grandfather and grandmother equally, if both are living; but if one is dead, the entire moiety shall
go to the survivor; if there is no grandfather or grandmother, then
(b) To the uncles and aunts and their descendants; if there are none, then
(c) To the stepchildren of the decedent[great-grandfathers and great-grandmothers, in the same manner
prescribed for grandfather and grandmother by subsection (a); if there are none, then
(d) To the brothers and sisters of the grandfathers and grandmothers and their descendants; and so on in
other cases without end, passing to the nearest lineal ancestors and their descendants].
(6) If there is no[ such] kindred[ to one of the parents] as is described in subsection (5) of this section, the whole
shall vest in the state under KRS 393.020[to go to the kindred of the other. If there is neither paternal nor
maternal kindred, the whole shall go to the kindred of the husband or wife, as if he or she had survived the
intestate and died entitled to the estate].
Section 2. KRS 392.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) After the death of the husband or wife intestate, the survivor shall have, in addition to his or her share
under Section 1 of this Act, an estate[ in fee of one-half (1/2) of the surplus real estate of which the
other spouse or anyone for the use of the other spouse, was seized of an estate in fee simple at the time
of death, and shall have an estate] for his or her life in one-third (1/3) of any real estate of which the
other spouse or anyone for the use of the other spouse, was seized of an estate in fee simple during the
coverture but not at the time of death, unless the survivor's right to the[such] interest has been barred,
forfeited, or relinquished.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) The survivor shall also have an absolute estate in one-half (1/2) of the surplus personalty left by the
decedent. Unless the context otherwise requires, any reference in the statutes of this state to "dower" or
"curtesy" shall be deemed to refer to the surviving spouse's interest created by this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, surplus personalty includes personal property
owned by the decedent at death that is:
(a) Payable pursuant to a:
1. Beneficiary designation;
2. Transfer on death designation; or
3. Payable on death designation, including retirement accounts whether designated as an
individual retirement account or otherwise; or
(b) Jointly owned with right of survivorship to another person.
(3) The surviving spouse's share of the decedent's surplus personalty shall be credited with any property
described in subsection (2) of this section received by the surviving spouse at the decedent's death, less the
amount of payment made for the decedent's funeral and burial expenses as confirmed by receipt of
payment, or by contract or other written document of obligation for payment.
(4) (a) Surplus personalty shall not include the death benefit payable on any life insurance policy insuring
the life of the decedent;
(b) Life insurance proceeds payable to the surviving spouse shall be credited against the surviving
spouse's share of the decedent's surplus personalty; and
(c) Life insurance proceeds payable to a trust of which the surviving spouse is a beneficiary shall be
credited against the surviving spouse's share of the decedent's surplus personalty in an amount
determined under subsection (7) of this section.
(5) Surplus real estate and surplus personalty include all property held by or payable at the decedent's death:
(a) To a trust over which the decedent held at the time of death a power of revocation; and
(b) Over which the decedent held at the time of death a general power of appointment as defined in KRS
390.020.
(6) Property of any kind transferred by the decedent to a person or trust, other than a trust for the benefit of the
surviving spouse, the decedent, or a qualified charitable organization two (2) years or more prior to death,
is not surplus personalty and is not surplus real estate. Property of any kind transferred by the decedent to a
person or trust less than two (2) years prior to death is surplus personalty or surplus real estate.
(7) Property of any kind transferred prior to the decedent's death and held at the decedent's death by a trust
created by the decedent and of which the surviving spouse is a beneficiary shall be:
(a) Deemed surplus personalty or surplus real estate as applicable; and
(b) Credited against the surviving spouse's share of the decedent's surplus real estate and surplus
personalty, in an amount computed under 26 U.S.C. sec. 7520.
(8) The surviving spouse may bring an action against any person receiving property that is part of the surplus
real estate or surplus personalty as necessary to satisfy the dower or curtesy claim of the surviving spouse
with respect to that property.
Section 3. KRS 394.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Every will[ or authenticated copy] admitted to probate[record] by any court shall be recorded by the
county clerk, and shall remain in the[his] office of the county clerk[,] except:
1. During such time as it may be carried to another court under subpoena duces tecum; or
2. As provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(b) For any will recorded on or after January 1, 2027, the county clerk shall return the will to the person
designated in the order admitting the will to probate no earlier than two (2) years after it has been
recorded by the county clerk.

CHAPTER 134 3
(c) Any will recorded with the county clerk after January 1, 1978, and prior to January 1, 2027, that
remains in the office of the county clerk may be destroyed or returned to either the person designated
in the order admitting the will to probate or the person appointed as the executor or executrix of the
decedent's estate no earlier than ten (10) years after the date of recording.
(d) Upon receipt of any notice required under KRS 394.240, the county clerk shall not return a will
under paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection until:
1. The adversarial proceeding is final and nonappealable; or
2. Authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(e) Any attempted return of a will under paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection that is:
1. Returned to the county clerk as undeliverable; or
2. Precluded due to insufficient information regarding an address or to whom the will should be
returned;
may be destroyed.
(2) (a) A will probated in the court of one Kentucky county and recorded in the office of the county clerk for
that county may be recorded in the office of the county clerk for other counties without the process of
probate in the other county.
(b) Production of an attested copy of the will together with an attested copy of the order of probate shall be
required by the county clerk of the other county before recordation.
(c) The clerk shall make the same charge for recordation as is otherwise provided for recording a will.
Section 4. KRS 395.015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Before being appointed as executor, administrator, curator, or administrator with the will annexed, every
person shall make and file in duplicate a written application for appointment under oath, which shall
include:[must state]
(a) The names of the deceased's surviving spouse and all of his or her heirs-at-law[ or such] as are known,
and the United States postal address and electronic mail[their post office] address of each if known;[,]
(b) The date of death;[ and also a statement in general terms as to what the estate consists of and the
probable value of the personal and real estate and also]
(c) A statement of any indebtedness owing by the applicant to the deceased;
(d) If the decedent died testate, the name and address of the person to whom any will admitted to probate
and recorded with the county clerk is to be returned under Section 3 of this Act; and
(e) An acknowledgment by the person seeking appointment as executor, administrator, curator, or
administrator with the will annexed in substantially the following form:
"Upon appointment, I agree to faithfully execute the duties required by law, and such additional
duties ordered by the court, and that I am subject to removal as a fiduciary if I fail to perform the
required duties, and subject to possible civil and criminal penalties for improper conversion of any
property I hold as a fiduciary."
(2) (a) If the decedent died testate, the decedent's will shall be presented to the court prior to or at the time of
any appointment.
(b) After the will is admitted to probate, the clerk of the court shall:
1. Beginning January 1, 2028, collect the fee required by the county clerk under Section 56 of
this Act for the filing of a will and the tax required under Section 57 of this Act; and
2. Deliver the following to the county clerk:
a. The will and a certified copy of the order admitting the will to probate, which shall
include the name and address of the person to whom the will is to be returned as
provided under Section 3 of this Act; and
b. The filing fee and tax collected under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) (a) A written general financial disclosure statement of the property of the decedent, to the extent known,
shall be filed separately at the time of filing the application for appointment.
(b) The general financial disclosure statement shall comply with the requirements in subsection (4) of
this section and shall include the approximate value, determined in good faith, of all real and
personal property known by the applicant which may include:
1. Furniture and household goods;
2. Personal effects, including jewelry and collectibles;
3. Stocks, bonds, bank accounts, and retirement accounts that do not constitute a
nontestamentary transfer on death as provided in KRS 391.360;
4. Insurance policies if payable to the estate of the decedent;
5. Real property that is not held in joint ownership with another with right of survivorship; and
6. Any other personal property accurately identified, including the decedent's share in any
partnership or ownership in any other entity.
(c) The general financial disclosure statement shall be confidential, placed under seal when filed, and
disclosed only:
1. To the personal representative;
2. To the personal representative's attorney;
3. To any beneficiary or heir at law;
4. As required under subsection (9) of this section and Section 13 of this Act; or
5. By order of the court upon a showing of good cause that shall include a creditor who has filed
a verified statement of claim against the estate.
(d) As used in paragraph (c) of this subsection, and in subsection (7) of Section 13 of this Act, a finding
of good cause shall not:
1. Be based solely on the position of the decedent as a public official, public figure, or other
person who has drawn substantial public attention due to the person's official acts, fame,
notoriety, or celebrity; or
2. Be made if the release of the protected information would constitute a clearly unwarranted
invasion or exploitation of personal privacy or proprietary interests of a beneficiary of the
estate or an heir at law without substantial evidence of irreparable harm or material financial
loss if release of the requested information to the requesting party is denied.
(4) The application for appointment and the general financial disclosure statement shall be signed and dated by
the person seeking the appointment and the acknowledgment required under subsections (1) and (3) of this
section may be satisfied, with like force and effect, by a written and dated declaration under the penalty of
perjury, in substantially the following form:
"I declare under the penalties of perjury of the laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, which may include
a fine or imprisonment, that the foregoing is true and correct."
(5) If[The foregoing requirement in respect to names and addresses of heirs-at-law may be omitted when] the
application for appointment is being made by the executor named in the will, the names and addresses of the
heirs at law may be omitted unless requested by the court.
(6) The application of a nonresident shall include the designation of a resident of the county where probate or
administration is pending as his or her agent for the service of process in any action against him or her as
personal representative or personally, provided that the[such] personal action must have accrued in the
administration of the estate[. A duplicate copy of said application shall be mailed by the clerk to the secretary
of revenue of the State of Kentucky].
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the court shall set a time for hearing the
application for appointment when:
1. [(2) In the case of intestacy, or where ]An administrator with will annexed or de bonis non is
to be appointed and there is[, if there be ] no surviving spouse; or[, or if such ]

CHAPTER 134 5
2. The surviving spouse waives the right of appointment or is not qualified to act and does not
nominate a suitable administrator, and there is more than one (1) resident heir-at-law entitled to
appointment[, the court shall thereupon set a time for hearing such application].
(b) No hearing shall be required under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection if the surviving spouse and all
of the known heirs at law have executed a waiver of the right to a hearing.
(c) Notice of any[said] hearing set under this subsection shall be given to the surviving spouse and all
known heirs of the deceased residing in the state, or elsewhere, in the manner provided in KRS 395.016.
(8) Upon receipt of the filings and presentation of the will as required under this section, the court, in its
discretion, shall determine if a hearing on the application for the appointment of a fiduciary is required.
(9) The clerk of the court shall transmit a copy of the application and general financial disclosure statement to
the commissioner of the Department of Revenue.
Section 5. KRS 395.016 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) When a hearing is ordered by the court, notice of the hearing on[of] an application for the appointment
of a fiduciary, or petition for the probate of a will,[an administrator, administrator with will annexed or
guardian is required , it] shall be given by mailing written notice of the time, place, and purpose of
the[such] hearing at least five (5) days before the[said] hearing.
(b) Proof of[ such] notice shall be by:
1. Certified mail, return receipt requested; or[ by]
2. The applicant's written and dated declaration in conformity with the requirements of a
declaration under subsection (4) of Section 4 of this Act[affidavit] that notice of the
hearing[the same] was mailed to each of the parties[ entitled thereto] in a sealed envelope,
postage prepaid, and the date when posted.[, which]
(c) Proof of notice shall be filed at the time of the hearing.
(2) If all parties entitled to notice are under no disability and waive notice in writing, the court may hear the[such]
application as if notice had been given. The waiver of notice may be filed before or at the time of the hearing.
(3) A minor over fourteen (14) years of age may waive notice of the hearing if he or she is present in person at
the[ time of] hearing.[ of application for appointment of his guardian; provided, however]
(4) In any estate where the gross amount involved is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) the court, in its
discretion, may dispense with the notice requirements of this section[ relating to notice].
Section 6. KRS 395.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The person named in a will as executor shall not act as executor to any extent until:
(a) The will or an authenticated copy of the will is admitted to probate;[record, and]
(b) He or she has presented an executed surety bond when required under Section 11 of this Act; and
(c) He or she has taken an oath in the court in which the record is made, or if no hearing is required by
the court for appointment, has filed with the court in which the record is made the declaration
executed under penalty of perjury in accordance with Section 10 of this Act.
(2) The person named in a will as executor[He] may, however, provide for the burial of the testator, pay the
reasonable funeral expenses, and take care of and preserve the estate.
Section 7. KRS 395.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If no executor is appointed by the will, or if all the executors named in the will die, refuse the executorship, or
fail to provide surety[give] bond if required by the court, the court may grant administration with the will
annexed to the person who would have been entitled to administration if there had been no will, but a[no]
person whose interests are antagonistic to the provisions of the will shall not be eligible to appointment as
administrator with the will annexed[ whose interests are antagonistic to the provisions of the will]. Failure to
provide surety[give] bond when required by the court shall amount to refusal to act as executor.
(2) An administrator with the will annexed shall possess and exercise all power and authority, have the same
rights and interest, and be responsible in like manner as the executors named in it.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 8. KRS 395.080 is amended to read as follows:
If all the persons nominated as executors are under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of probating the will, or those
who are of age fail to qualify, administration with the will annexed may be granted during[ such] minority. [But ]If a
testator, by his or her will, so directs, however, then the[such] infant executor may qualify and, if required by the
court, give surety bond as an adult.
Section 9. KRS 395.105 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every fiduciary, before entering upon the execution of the trust, shall receive letters of appointment from the
District Court having jurisdiction as[ now] fixed by law.
(2) The duties of a fiduciary shall be those[such as are] required by law, and any[such] additional duties[ not
inconsistent therewith] as the court may order.
(3) The appointment of the personal representative shall be effective upon[with] the signing of an order by the
judge, the presentation to the clerk of an executed surety bond when required under Section 11 of this Act,
and either the administration of any oaths required in Section 10 of this Act, or the filing of the declaration
in Section 10 of this Act if no hearing is required.
Section 10. KRS 395.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the court requires a hearing for the appointment of the fiduciary, each executor, administrator,[ and]
curator, and administrator with the will annexed or de bonis non shall take an oath before the court in which
the application for appointment is made to faithfully perform the duties of his or her office to the best of his
or her judgment.
(2) (a) The oaths required of the executor, administrator, curator, and administrator with the will annexed
or de bonis non may be satisfied by execution of the following declaration:
"1. I, the undersigned, agree to faithfully perform the duties of the office as required by law,
including but not limited to:
a. Deposit all funds which come into my hands in a lawful depository located within this
Commonwealth and provide canceled checks as may be required to prove accounts;
b. Keep estate funds in separate estate accounts at all times during the administration of
the estate;
c. Invest all funds in a lawful manner;
d. Make and file all required documents when due as required by law;
e. File all tax documents as required by law;
f. Maintain adequate insurance to reasonably protect any property that I may hold as a
fiduciary; and
g. Obey all orders of the court;
2. I, the undersigned, understand I am subject to removal as the fiduciary if I fail to perform the
duties required of me under the laws of this state and that I am subject to possible fines, and
civil and criminal penalties for improper conversion of the property that I hold as fiduciary;
and
3. If applicable, I, the undersigned, declare that my intestate, so far as I know or believe, died
without leaving a will."
(b) The oath sworn or affirmed in the presence of a notary public, or the declaration if authorized by the
court, shall be presented to the appropriate clerk of the court with the fiduciary's application for
appointment[ Each administrator shall also take an oath that his intestate, so far as he knows or
believes, died without leaving a will].
Section 11. KRS 395.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No bond shall be required of a personal representative appointed under this chapter except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The court shall order a surety bond of a personal representative appointed under this chapter when the:

CHAPTER 134 7
(a) Appointment is of a public administrator under Section 16 of this Act or a curator under Section 19
of this Act; or
(b) Court, in its discretion, determines that a surety bond is required to adequately protect all interests in
the estate. In exercising its discretion under this paragraph, the court may consider the:
1. Expression of intent of the testator under a will or trust; however, notwithstanding any other
law to the contrary, the court shall not be bound by the expressed intent; and
2. Experience of the personal representative, including whether or not the personal
representative is acting as a fiduciary in any other matter.
(3) (a) Every fiduciary of whom surety bond is required under subsection (2) of this section[, except as
provided in KRS 286.3-220 and 386B.7-020,] shall provide the surety bond as ordered by the court.[on
his bond unless, on the petition of any interested party, the court upon being satisfied that all interests
are adequately protected excuses the requirement of a surety, or unless, by the terms of the will or trust,
surety is not required. Subsequent to the qualification of a fiduciary and]
(b) On motion of any interested party the court may:
1. Reduce or increase the amount of the surety bond;[, release the surety,] or
2. Permit the substitution of another surety bond with the same or different sureties.
(4) If an executor does not give surety bond when required to do so, he or she shall not be authorized to act as
executor[permitted to qualify], and, if he or she has already been appointed,[qualified, he] shall be removed.
(5)[(2)] Whenever any personal representative, guardian, conservator, or fiduciary who is required by law to
execute a surety bond for the faithful discharge of his or her duties or fulfillment of his or her trust, procures
as surety on his or her bond an incorporated surety company authorized to do business in this state, the
necessary and reasonable cost incident to the surety bond shall be a lawful charge against the estate in the
hands of the fiduciary, as other expenses of administration, and in his or her settlement the fiduciary shall be
entitled to credit by the amount actually paid by him or her for that purpose, subject to the approval of the
court which has approved the surety bond.
Section 12. KRS 395.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A fiduciary required to execute a surety bond shall deliver to the clerk of the court of the county in which he
or she is appointed a surety bond payable to and with the Commonwealth, subscribed to by the principal
and sureties in the presence of a notary, in the amount, and with sufficient sureties, as may be approved by
the court in its order of appointment.
(2) The District Court shall not accept as surety, in any surety bond of a personal representative, any master or
other commissioner whose duty is to settle the accounts of personal representatives, or any judge or clerk of a
District Court or practicing attorney of that court.
(3)[(2)] The surety bond shall be filed[subscribed by the principal and sureties, approved by the court, attested
by the clerk of the court and carefully kept] by the clerk in his or her office in a record maintained[book to be
provided] for that purpose.
Section 13. KRS 395.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) It shall be the duty of a personal representative of a decedent to file[return] an inventory[ in duplicate]
no later than ninety (90) days[within two (2) months] from the time of qualifying as personal
representative.[ such, to the clerk's office of the court in which he qualified,]
(b) The inventory[original of which] shall be confidential except as provided in subsection (2)(a) of this
section, and shall be placed under seal when filed. The clerk of the court shall transmit a copy of the
inventory[ recorded by the clerk and the duplicate shall be mailed by the clerk] to the
commissioner[secretary] of the Department of Revenue.
(2) (a) It shall be the duty of the personal representative of a decedent to furnish a filed copy of the
inventory required under subsection (1) of this section to any person authorized under subsection
(3)(c) of Section 4 of this Act who has requested a copy, or to whom the court has ordered disclosure
of assets and liabilities.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) No person or entity authorized under subsection (3)(c) of Section 4 of this Act or by the court to
receive records under seal, including the inventory filed under this section, shall copy, reproduce, or
in any way release any information contained in the records without specific authorization from the
court in which the personal representative qualified. Violation of this paragraph shall be a basis for a
finding of contempt of court.
(3) Copies from the record of the inventory or appraisement shall be prima facie evidence for or against the
personal[such] representative when required and approved for release by the court for that purpose.
(4) If any property not included in the initial inventory comes to the knowledge of the personal representative,
or if the personal representative learns that the value or description of any item listed in the initial inventory
is erroneous or misleading, the personal representative shall file an amended inventory with the court.
(5) (a) If the personal representative has cause to believe that any of the assets of the estate are concealed or
wrongfully withheld from the personal representative, or that any person has in his or her possession
or under his or her control any records, books, documents, or related information concerning
withheld assets or the ownership of withheld assets, the personal representative shall petition the
court before which the estate action is pending for an order compelling discovery of the required
information.
(b) All parties named in the petition may be compelled to provide under oath either by response to the
petition or by personal testimony to the court, all the facts known to them concerning the assets of the
estate and any adverse claims relating to the assets of the estate.
(c) If the court finds that any person has property or assets of the estate to which there is no adverse
claim, the court shall direct the property or asset be delivered to the personal representative who shall
account for the property or asset in an amended inventory filed with the court no later than twenty
(20) days following entry of the court's order.
(6) Any settlement ordered or filed under this chapter shall be filed in compliance with the confidentiality
provisions in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(7) Additional documents containing information regarding the assets or value of the decedent's estate shall
not be ordered to be filed except upon motion with good cause shown, and any document filed under this
section shall be in compliance with the confidentiality provisions in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(8) Failure to timely file any inventory when due shall be subject to the penalties in Sections 14 and 30 of this
Act.
Section 14. KRS 395.255 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the clerk of the court to report to the judge once each month the names and addresses
of all fiduciaries who failed to submit an inventory or settlement due according to law during the previous
calendar month.
(2) The judge shall notify the fiduciaries reported under subsection (1) of this section of their failure to file an
inventory or settlement and shall warn them of the penalties provided by law.
(3) If a fiduciary neglects or refuses to file an inventory or settlement[account] when due according to law, or
when ordered by the court, the court shall notify the fiduciary of his or her delinquency and fix a date when
the[such] inventory or settlement shall[account must] be filed.[ Unless there is pending in the circuit court a
suit to settle the estate such neglect or refusal shall be grounds for removal by the court.]
(4) (a) If the fiduciary fails to file the inventory or settlement by the extended date ordered by the court[such
account within thirty days after the date fixed in said notice], the court shall enter an order for the
fiduciary to appear before the court to show cause why he or she should not be found to have
breached his or her fiduciary duty and be:
1. Removed from service as a fiduciary;
2. Found in contempt of court;
3. Fined in accordance with Section 30 of this Act;
4. Denied any[no] allowance[ shall be made] for his or her services; or
5. Be subject to any other penalty authorized by law for breach of a fiduciary duty[ unless the
court enters upon its minutes an order that such delay was justified].

CHAPTER 134 9
(b) Failure to appear at a show cause hearing under this subsection shall result in automatic removal
from service as a fiduciary.
(5) The time for filing an inventory or settlement under this section shall not be extended by more than thirty
(30) days following a hearing:
(a) Unless there is pending in Circuit Court a suit to settle the estate; or
(b) Upon good cause shown by the fiduciary.
Section 15. KRS 395.300 is amended to read as follows:
An administrator de bonis non or any other successor appointed in the place of a personal representative who has
resigned,[ or] has been removed,[ or] whose letters have been revoked,[ or who] has ceased to act, or has died, may
maintain an action against the former personal representative and the sureties on the administration surety bond, if
any, and against the predecessor's real and personal representatives, for all damages or debts arising from the
maladministration or omission of the predecessor.
Section 16. KRS 395.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The District Court of each county shall appoint a discreet, qualified[fit] person to act as administrator of
decedents' estates of which there is no personal representative, and as guardian of orphans who have no
guardian.
(2) The public administrator or guardian appointed under this section:[He]
(a) Shall serve at the discretion of the District Court;[.]
(b)[(3) He] Shall be sworn and execute bond with good surety to the state for the faithful discharge of his or
her duties;[,] and
(c) Upon being duly sworn and executing surety bond[when so sworn with bond so executed], shall be
accepted by the court in every estate in which the public administrator is appointed without the
necessity of additional surety.
Section 17. KRS 395.390 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The District Court of a county which has a public administrator and guardian shall, after the expiration
of sixty (60) days from the death of the decedent, order the public administrator and guardian to
administer the estate of the decedent where:
1. The surviving spouse and heirs waive their right to be appointed;[, or if ]
2. The surviving spouse does not nominate a suitable administrator;[, or in the event ]
3. Any of the persons designated in KRS 395.040 are unable[,] or found to be incapable of handling
or managing the estate;[,] or
4. [If ]From any other cause there is no personal representative.
(b) If there is no public administrator and guardian, the court shall use its discretion to appoint an
administrator[order the sheriff] to administer the estate.
(2) (a) The District Court shall also confide to the public administrator and guardian the care and control of the
persons and estates of all minors when it appears that a minor has no testamentary guardian and no one
will apply for appointment, or serve, as guardian.
(b) If there is no public administrator and guardian, the court shall use its discretion to appoint a
guardian to serve under this subsection.
Section 18. KRS 395.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The public administrator and guardian or person appointed under Section 17 of this Act[sheriff] shall, by[
virtue of his office and the] order of the court, be the administrator or administrator de bonis non, or if there is
a will, administrator with the will annexed, and shall have all the rights and powers,[ and] be subjected to the
same liabilities, and be governed by the same laws prescribed for administrators and guardians.[ If the sheriff
is acting, his powers, rights, duties and liabilities shall not expire with his office of sheriff.]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) The court may, however, at any time, set aside the order entrusting the estate to the public administrator and
guardian or person appointed under Section 17 of this Act[sheriff] and allow an executor or administrator to
qualify.
Section 19. KRS 395.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) During the contest about the probate of a will, or when the court for any valid cause is delayed in granting
letters testamentary or of administration, it may appoint a curator to collect and preserve the estate of the
decedent until probate of the will is granted, or until the cause for which the order was made is removed.
(2) When any resident of this state or person owning property in this state has been absent from his or her last
known place of residence for a period of one (1) year and is not known to have been living during that time,
the District Court of any county in which a personal representative could be appointed for that person's estate
if deceased, may appoint a curator to collect and preserve the estate of that absent person.
(3) The court shall take a surety bond payable to and with the Commonwealth[with good surety] from the person
appointed curator. The surety bond shall be subscribed to by the principal and sureties in the presence of a
notary or as may be otherwise authorized by the court, for the full and faithful performance of the trust
confided in him or her.
(4) The surety bond shall be kept by the clerk of the court in his or her office in a record to be maintained for
that purpose.
Section 20. KRS 395.455 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Where the exemption for[of] the surviving spouse or children, alone[,] or together with preferred claims, paid
by either the surviving spouse or children or by the surviving spouse where the surviving spouse's[a widow
or by the widower where the wife's] estate is legally liable for payment, equals or exceeds the amount of
distributable[probatable] assets, the court may order that administration of the estate be dispensed with and
the[such] assets be transferred to the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, to the surviving
children, or to a person designated by the[such] surviving spouse[ to receive all or part of such assets]. The
court may[ so] order that administration of the estate be dispensed with in both testate and intestate estates[
and] without requiring the renunciation of a will[ or the giving of bond].
(2) If the court is satisfied that no distributable[probatable] estate will pass through the hands of the personal
representative, it may order that no letters of administration be issued and in the case of a testate estate, order
that the will be probated only.
(3) The court may order that the administration of the estate be dispensed with and the assets transferred in
favor of a preferred creditor or other person where:
(a) A surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the surviving children have[has] waived[ his or
her right to] the exemption accorded by law in favor of a person who has paid preferred claims in an
amount equaling[equalling] or exceeding the amount of distributable[probatable] assets or who is
legally entitled to[ such] payment;[,] or
(b) [where ]There is no surviving spouse or surviving children, and another[such] person has paid
preferred claims[made such payment] or is legally entitled to payment[thereto, the court may order that
the administration of the estate be dispensed with and such assets transferred to such person. The court
may so order without requiring the giving of bond].
(4) For purpose of this section, the exemption for[of] the surviving spouse and children shall be the[ is such]
exemption[ as has been] created by KRS 391.030, and preferred claims shall be[are] those listed in KRS
396.095 and in the order listed[thereof].
Section 21. KRS 395.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Administration of the estate of a person dying testate or intestate may be dispensed with by agreement if:
(a) There are no debts owing by the estate;
(b) All beneficiaries[persons beneficially] entitled to the personal estate have agreed in writing, under
penalty of perjury, that there shall be no further administration, and if applicable, have designated a
trustee with power to collect claims and demands;
(c) Advertisement has occurred as required in subsection (7) of this section, as evidenced by an
acknowledgment under penalty of perjury;

CHAPTER 134 11
(d) Provision has been made for the state inheritance tax and the federal estate tax, if any; and
(e) [Either ]There are no claims or demands due the estate, if no trustee has been designated by
agreement[or the written agreement to dispense with administration designates a trustee with power to
collect claims and demands].
(2) (a) The written agreement required[provided] in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be acknowledged
under penalty of perjury by the beneficiaries; and
(b) The agreements of all beneficiaries shall be[parties and] filed in the District Court together with the
motion[ of the parties] for an order dispensing with administration by agreement.
(3) An agreement prescribed in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be effective if it is executed by a person
who had authority to contract on behalf of a beneficiary when signed.
(4) A motion to dispense with administration by agreement may be filed at any time after:
(a) Probate of the will, if any;
(b) Appointment of a personal representative: and
(c) Advertisement for creditors as required under this section.
(5) If the court is satisfied by the agreements[affidavit or otherwise] that the conditions prescribed in subsection
(1) of this section exist, the court[it] shall enter an order dispensing with any further administration by
agreement.
(6) If the motion and the agreements[written agreement] of the beneficiaries designate[designates] a trustee to
collect claims or demands, the order shall confirm the designation, and the person[ so] designated as the
trustee shall have the same right to sue for and collect claims and demands as[that] an administrator appointed
under this chapter[has.
(3) The District Court shall be satisfied that provision has been made for the state inheritance tax and the United
States estate tax].
(7) (a)[(4)] Prior to moving to dispense with administration by agreement, the beneficiaries[persons
applying for an order dispensing with administration] shall advertise for creditors of the estate[intestate]
to appear and present any[their] claims to some person at the county seat. The person and place shall be
designated in the advertisement.
(b) The advertisement shall also give notice of when, where, and by whom the order dispensing with
administration by agreement will be applied for.
(c) The advertisement shall be posted at the courthouse door for six (6) weeks[,] and published pursuant to
KRS Chapter 424.[ The order dispensing with administration shall not be granted until the persons
applying for the order file in the District Court the affidavit of one (1) of them showing that
advertisement for creditors has been made.]
(8)[(5)] The court may order that the beneficiaries[persons] applying for the order dispensing with
administration by agreement[shall], before the order is entered, execute a surety[give] bond[ with surety] in
the amount of the personal estate for the benefit of any creditors who, within six (6) months from the order
dispensing with administration by agreement, appear and file their claims with the court clerk. This surety
bond shall be approved by the District Court and shall run to the state for the benefit of those creditors and be
conditioned to be void if none of them files a[his] claim with the clerk within six (6) months from the date of
the order dispensing with administration by agreement.
Section 22. KRS 395.605 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the[ sworn] application of any fiduciary, under penalty of perjury, that the fiduciary is the sole
beneficiary of any estate, the court may dispense with the requirements of this chapter regarding[ periodic or
final] settlement of fiduciaries' accounts[ and may dispense with the requirements of a surety for the fiduciary]
and shall accept from the fiduciary an informal final settlement if:
(a) [. The informal settlement shall be made, under oath, by the fiduciary and shall state that ]The estate
was solvent;[ that]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) All legal claims and debts have been paid, or if not paid, the manner in which the claims and debts have
been provided for;
(c) [that, for final settlement, ]The requirements of the inheritance, estate, or similar death statutes have
been met and the tax paid, if due and payable;
(d) [that ]All court costs have been paid;
(e) The name of the attorney(s), if any, representing the fiduciary, and the amount of the attorney's fee have
been provided;[,] and
(f) [that ]The beneficiary has received his or her share[. An informal settlement may be filed at any time
after expiration of six (6) months from the fiduciary's appointment. Upon the filing of the informal final
settlement, the court may enter an order discharging the fiduciary, and his or her surety, if any. When a
settlement is effected in the informal manner, no notice to any person shall be required nor shall the
court be compelled to inquire into detailed items of income or disbursements].
(2) (a) Upon application of any fiduciary, under penalty of perjury,[If a proposed periodic or final settlement
of a fiduciary is] accompanied by[ a] verified waivers[waiver] executed by all of the beneficiaries of an
estate,[ and] none of whom is[the beneficiaries is] under a disability, the court shall accept from the
fiduciary an informal final settlement which meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Any beneficiary[Said beneficiaries] may request an accounting of the assets of the estate prior to
execution of the waiver.
(c) A[No] verified waiver shall not be required[need be obtained] from a nonresiduary legatee who has
received and receipted for his or her legacy, and the canceled check or signed receipt attached to the
proposed settlement shall be[being] sufficient evidence of satisfaction.[ The court may require the
fiduciary to execute bond with or without surety to insure the application of the estate assets to the debts
of the decedent.]
(3) An informal final settlement may be filed at any time after expiration of six (6) months from the date of the
fiduciary's appointment.
(4) The court shall not require notice to any person or a hearing prior to approval and confirmation of an
informal final settlement.
(5) Upon approval and confirmation of the informal final settlement, the court may enter an order discharging
the fiduciary, and his or her surety, if any.
(6) In the event that one (1) or more of the beneficiaries of the estate is under a disability, the court may allow the
filing of an informal final settlement if the court is of the opinion that the best interests of the person under the
disability would be served.
Section 23. KRS 395.610 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Two (2) years after appointment and annually thereafter, unless otherwise provided by law, every fiduciary as
defined in KRS 395.001, other than a guardian or conservator of a mentally disabled person, shall render an
account of the execution of his or her trust and file it with[to] the court by which he or she was appointed[,
including in the account an itemized statement of receipts and disbursements supported by vouchers
accompanying the account and a statement of all investments on hand and changes in investments since the
filing of his last account. The settlements, when approved and confirmed by the court, shall be recorded and
indexed by the clerk, and the original and the vouchers carefully kept by him in his office].
(2) A periodic settlement shall be filed until all trust assets and investments have been fully distributed and all
debts, costs, fees, and taxes have been paid or accounted for.
(3) A periodic settlement shall identify all assets and investments of the trust estate on hand, including a
beginning and current value, and shall account for all receipts and disbursements occurring since the last
inventory or settlement with supporting documentation.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section[ An account shall be rendered by a fiduciary], at any other time
upon order of the court either on[upon] its own motion, or upon the motion[that] of any person interested in
the trust, for good cause shown, a fiduciary shall file a periodic settlement that meets the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section and as otherwise ordered by the court.
(5) In addition to the requirements of subsection (3) of this section, all final settlements shall include:

CHAPTER 134 13
(a) A complete accounting[ on affidavit. At the expiration of his trust, the fiduciary shall fully account] for
and distribution of[pay over] the trust estate assets and investments, including whether the
distribution was:
1. In kind and if so to whom; or
2. Liquidated for cash for payment of debts, costs of administration, or pecuniary legacies;
(b) A[to the person or persons entitled thereto. Every such account shall] list of all unpaid creditors whose
claims have been allowed and all creditors whose claims have been disallowed;
(c) Fees and commissions paid to the fiduciary and his or her attorney; and
(d) Provision for state inheritance tax and federal estate tax, if any.
(6) No settlement[account] of a fiduciary, except of corporate fiduciaries under the supervision of state or federal
banking authorities, shall be approved until there are exhibited to the court, for its examination, the security or
securities shown in the account as being in the hands of the fiduciary, or the certificate of a bank having
possession thereof or in which they have been deposited for safekeeping, and a certified bank statement
showing the funds to the credit of the trust.
(7) The clerk of the court shall record all settlements that are approved and confirmed by the court.
(8)[(2)] Guardians and conservators of mentally disabled persons may be required to render accountings to the
court under the provisions of this section. Guardians and conservators of mentally disabled persons shall
comply with the reporting requirements of KRS Chapter 387.
Section 24. KRS 395.617 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A fiduciary may, prior to filing a periodic or final settlement and prior to a distribution of assets, file with the
court a proposed periodic or final settlement within the time prescribed for filing settlements in Section 23 of
this Act.
(2) The proposed settlement shall be set for hearing, and in addition to the notice given as provided in Section 26
of this Act as for any other settlement, the fiduciary shall notify all[ except that] beneficiaries of the estate,
other than nonresiduary legatees who have received and receipted for their legacies,[ shall also receive notice
from the fiduciary] by certified mail, return receipt requested, at least twenty (20) days prior to the hearing
date.
(3) The proposed settlement shall comply with the requirements for periodic and final settlements in Section 23
of this Act, except the proposed settlement[set forth all assets and disbursements previously made,] shall also
indicate any assets[ on hand and] anticipated to be received subsequent to filing[the date of] the proposed
settlement and prior to the filing of the periodic or final settlement and the proposed distribution of all or a
portion of the assets. Documentation supporting receipts and past disbursements shall not be required to be
filed with the proposed settlement unless ordered by the court if exceptions are filed[, and shall further
indicate the manner in which the remaining and anticipated assets are proposed to be distributed. The proposal
may set forth which assets are to be distributed in kind and to whom and which assets may be liquidated for
distribution of cash or for payment of debts, costs of administration, or pecuniary legacies. The proposal may
also indicate claims proposed to be allowed or disallowed, in whole or in part, and may also indicate fees and
commissions proposed to be paid to the fiduciary and his attorney. The inclusion of evidence and vouchers to
accompany the proposal shall not be necessary unless required by the court upon exceptions filed].
(4) At the hearing, if no exceptions are filed, the proposal, if made according to law, shall be approved. If
exceptions are filed, other evidence besides that reported may be heard, and the court shall, upon the whole
case, reject, confirm, alter, or amend the proposal.
(5) Following the entry of an order approving, confirming, or amending the proposed settlement[of approval or
of an order of amendment], the fiduciary shall disburse the assets in accordance with the order[therewith].
Following the distribution, the fiduciary shall file a settlement accompanied by documentation[evidence and
vouchers] showing that distribution was effected in conformity with the[ court] order approving, confirming,
or amending[. If it appears to the court that the distribution was in conformity, the court shall confirm the
settlement and, if the settlement is final, discharge the fiduciary and his surety without further hearing or
notice to any person].
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) [(2)] An aggrieved party may, no later than thirty (30) days from the entry of the order upon the proposed
settlement, institute an adversary proceeding in Circuit Court pursuant to KRS 24A.120(2).
Section 25. KRS 395.620 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The District Judge shall review a periodic or final settlement filed by a fiduciary, accompanied by
documentation showing receipts, payments, and distribution.
(2) If the settlement is not submitted as provided in subsection (5) of Section 24 of this Act and otherwise found
by the court to be complete, the court shall direct the clerk of the court to[make a written report of the
settlement, showing each item of debit and credit, and the general result, and return it, with all evidence heard
and vouchers filed, to the Circuit Clerk. The clerk shall note it of record, and indorse on it the time of filing,
and] set a date for a hearing on the settlement and give notice as required in Section 26 of this Act [report].
(3)[(2)] If the settlement is found to be[A hearing on a settlement filed] in conformity with an order approving,
confirming, or amending a[approved] proposed settlement made under KRS 395.617, the court shall confirm
the settlement without further hearing or notice to any person and, if the settlement is final, discharge the
fiduciary and his or her surety, if any[ shall not be necessary].
Section 26. KRS 395.625 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of the
settlement hearing under Section 25 of this Act, the clerk of the court shall publish[cause] notice of the[ filing
of a] settlement[ to be published] pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.
(2) The notice required under subsection (1) of this section shall include the:
(a) [, stating the ]Name of the fiduciary;[, the ]
(b) Name of the trust;[, the ]
(c) Nature of the account; and[ the ]
(d) Date of hearing, with a statement that exceptions shall[must] be filed before the hearing.[that time;
except that]
(3) (a) Notwithstanding the publication requirement under subsection (1) of this section, with the court's
approval the fiduciary may, in lieu of the[such] publication, send a written notice of the
hearing[thereof] to all unpaid creditors and distributees;[, which ]
(b) The notice shall be mailed at least ten (10) days before the[said] date of hearing; and[. ]
(c) The fiduciary[ in such cases] shall file his or her affidavit that the[such] notice has been mailed.
(4) The actual cost of the notice, or the proportionate part of the notice[thereof], if more than one (1) settlement,
shall be taxed as costs.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the value of the trust or estate is[ not more than] two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less and the assets of the trust or estate are held in an account that may be
accessed only upon order of the court[, the provisions of this section shall not apply to settlements involving
that trust or estate].
Section 27. KRS 395.630 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At the settlement hearing, if no exceptions are filed, the settlement[report], if made according to law, shall be
approved[ and recorded].
(2) If exceptions are filed, other evidence[ besides that reported] may be heard, and the court shall upon the whole
case, reject, confirm, alter, or amend the settlement[report, and, if confirmed, order it to be recorded. The
vouchers accompanying the report shall not be recorded, but must be carefully kept on file with the report in
the clerk's office].
(3) Any[ new] evidence given in court must be electronically recorded and filed in the court record[with the
report].
(4) Settlements confirmed[so made] and filed in the court record[recorded] shall be prima facie evidence
between the interested parties[ interested].
Section 28. KRS 395.640 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 134 15
(1) The district judge shall at least once each year carefully inquire into the solvency of all the sureties upon the
bond of each fiduciary that is required by law, or has been ordered by the court to post surety bond.
(2) [, and ]If there is reason to believe that any bond is not amply sufficient to protect those interested, the district
judge[he] shall at once give notice to the fiduciary that a new bond, or additional surety on the old bond[one],
is required, and upon the failure of the fiduciary to give the required bond or surety within a reasonable time
fixed by the court, the court shall remove the fiduciary[him].
Section 29. KRS 395.645 is amended to read as follows:
When the court directs, settlements of the accounts of fiduciaries made before and reported by any trial
commissioner, and all settlements[reports] of estates or funds received or disbursed, under order of the court, by its
trial commissioner, after they have been confirmed by the court, shall be filed in the court record with the
documentation showing receipts, payments, and distributions[recorded by the clerk of the court in a book to be
provided for that purpose. The vouchers accompanying the settlements or reports shall not be recorded].
Section 30. KRS 395.990 is amended to read as follows:
Any fiduciary failing, without good cause[ therefor], to file his or her inventory or account as required by notice
given pursuant to KRS 395.255 shall be fined by the court, for each day he or she neglects or refuses after the date
fixed in the[said] notice, the sum of one hundred[ten] dollars ($100)[($10)], to be collected by rule or other process.
Section 31. KRS 199.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) After hearing the case, the court shall enter a judgment of adoption[,] if it finds that:
1. The facts stated in the petition were established;
2. [that ]All legal requirements, including jurisdiction, relating to the adoption have been complied
with;
3. [that ]The petitioners are of good moral character, of reputable standing in the community and of
ability to properly maintain and educate the child; and
4. [that ]The best interest of the child will be promoted by the adoption and that the child is suitable
for adoption.
(b) In the judgment, the name of the child shall be changed to conform with the prayer of the petition. The
judgment and all orders required to be entered and recorded in the order book, including the caption,
shall contain only the names of the petitioners and the proposed adopted name of the child, without any
reference to its former name or the names of its birth parents.
(2) (a) Upon entry of the judgment of adoption, from and after the date of the filing of the petition, the child
shall be:
1. Deemed the child of petitioners; and
2. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,[ shall be considered for purposes of
inheritance and succession and] for all[ other] legal considerations, the natural child of the
parents adopting it the same as if born of their bodies.
(b) For purposes of inheritance and succession, the child shall only be deemed the child of the
petitioners if the child was adopted and resided in the household of the petitioners prior to eighteen
(18) years of age.
(c) Upon granting an adoption, all legal relationship between the adopted child and the biological parents
shall be terminated except the relationship of a biological parent who is the spouse of an adoptive
parent.
(3) The clerk of the court shall notify the cabinet of any action of the court with respect to entering a judgment
granting an adoption, the amendment of an adoption, or the denial or dismissal of a petition for adoption.
(4) (a) The cabinet or other child-placing agency shall provide to the adoptive parents and the Circuit
Court,[health history and other nonidentifying background information of biological parents and blood
relatives of the adopted person,] in writing, on a standardized form[,] provided by the cabinet, the
health history and other nonidentifying background information of biological parents and blood
relatives of the adopted person to the extent[if] known,[ shall be given by the cabinet or child-placing
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
agency which has the information to the adoptive parents and to the Circuit Court] not later than the
date of finalization of the adoption proceedings. This information shall include the results of any tests
for HIV or hepatitis A, B, and C; and
(b) The information provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection, if known, shall, upon the request in
person or in writing of the adult adopted person, be made available in writing to that person. The
information shall not be made available if it[ is of a nature that] would[ tend to] identify the biological
parents of the adopted person, except as provided in KRS 199.570 and 199.572.
SECTION 32. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 32 to 40 of this Act:
(1) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;
(2) "Electronic presence" means the relationship of two (2) or more individuals in different locations
communicating in real time to the same extent as if the individuals were physically present in the same
location;
(3) "Electronic will" means a will executed electronically in compliance with the requirements of Section 35 of
this Act;
(4) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or
other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;
(5) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) To affix to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol or process;
(6) "State" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act; and
(7) "Will" has the same meaning as in Section 123 of this Act.
SECTION 33. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
An electronic will is a will for all purposes of the law of this Commonwealth. The law of this Commonwealth
applicable to wills and principles of equity apply to an electronic will, except as modified by Sections 32 to 40 of
this Act.
SECTION 34. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A will executed electronically but not in compliance with Section 35 of this Act is an electronic will if executed in
compliance with the law of the jurisdiction where the testator is:
(1) Physically located when the will is signed; or
(2) Domiciled or residing when the will is signed or when the testator dies.
SECTION 35. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (3) of Section 37 of this Act, an electronic will shall be:
(a) A record that is readable as text at the time of signing under paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(b) Signed by:
1. The testator; or
2. Another individual in the testator's name, in the testator's physical presence, and by the
testator's direction; and
(c) Signed in the physical or electronic presence of the testator by at least two (2) individuals, each of
whom is a resident of this Commonwealth and physically located in this Commonwealth at the time
of signing and within a reasonable time after witnessing:
1. The signing of the will under paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
2. The testator's acknowledgment of the signing of the will under paragraph (b) of this
subsection or acknowledgment of the will.

CHAPTER 134 17
(2) An electronic symbol of a testator or witness shall consist of an electronic image of the testator's or
witness's signature in his or her handwriting affixed to the electronic will.
(3) A testator's intent that the record under subsection (1)(a) of this section be the testator's electronic will may
be established by extrinsic evidence.
SECTION 36. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An electronic will may revoke all or part of a previous will.
(2) All or part of an electronic will may be revoked by:
(a) A subsequent will that revokes all or part of the electronic will expressly or by inconsistency; or
(b) A physical act, if it is established by clear and convincing evidence that the testator, with the intent of
revoking all or part of the will, performed the act or directed another individual who performed the
act in the testator's physical presence.
SECTION 37. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An electronic will may be simultaneously executed, attested, and made self-proving by acknowledgment of
the testator and affidavits of witnesses.
(2) The acknowledgment and affidavits under subsection (1) of this section shall be:
(a) Made before a notary public authorized to administer oaths under the law of the state in which
execution occurs or, if fewer than two (2) attesting witnesses are physically present in the same
location as the testator at the time of signing under subsection (1)(b) of Section 35 of this Act, before
a notary public authorized under KRS 423.455;
(b) Evidenced by the notary public's certificate under official seal affixed to or logically associated with
the electronic will; and
(c) In a form substantially similar to subsections (1) and (2) of KRS 394.225.
(3) A signature physically or electronically affixed to an affidavit that is affixed to or logically associated with
an electronic will under Sections 32 to 40 of this Act is deemed a signature of the electronic will under
subsection (1) of Section 35 of this Act.
SECTION 38. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
An individual may create a certified paper copy of an electronic will by affirming under penalty of perjury that a
paper copy of the electronic will is a complete, true, and accurate copy of the electronic will. If the electronic will
is made self-proving, the certified paper copy of the will shall include the self-proving affidavits.
SECTION 39. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 32 to 40 of this Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote
uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
SECTION 40. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 32 to 40 of this Act shall apply to the will of a decedent who dies on or after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 41. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 41 to 55 of this Act:
(1) "Electronic" has the same meaning as in Section 32 of this Act;
(2) "Electronic record" means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by
electronic means;
(3) "Electronic signature" means an electronic symbol or process attached to or logically associated with a
record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record;
(4) "Information" includes data, text, images, codes, computer programs, software, and databases;
(5) "Nontestamentary estate planning document" means a record relating to estate planning that is readable as
text at the time of signing and is not a will or contained in a will. The term:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Includes a record readable as text at the time of signing that creates, exercises, modifies, releases, or
revokes:
1. A trust instrument;
2. A trust power that under the terms of the trust requires a signed record;
3. A certification of a trust under KRS 386B.10-120;
4. A power of attorney that is durable under KRS Chapter 457;
5. An agent's certification under KRS 457.430;
6. A power of appointment;
7. An advance directive or medical order for scope of treatment under KRS 311.621 to 311.643;
8. A record directing disposition of an individual's body after death;
9. A nomination of a guardian for the signing individual;
10. A nomination of a guardian for a minor child or disabled adult child;
11. An advance directive for mental health treatment under KRS 202A.420 to 202A.432;
12. A community property survivorship agreement;
13. A disclaimer under KRS 394.035 or KRS 394.610 to 394.670; and
14. Any other record intended to carry out an individual's intent regarding property or health care
while incapacitated or on death; and
(b) Does not include a deed of real property or certificate of title for a motor vehicle, watercraft, or
aircraft;
(6) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(7) "Power of attorney" means a record that grants authority to an agent in place of the principal, even if the
term is not used in the record;
(8) "Record" has the same meaning as in Section 32 of this Act;
(9) "Security procedure" means a procedure to verify that an electronic signature, record, or performance is
that of a specific person or to detect a change or error in an electronic record. The term includes a
procedure that uses an algorithm, code, identifying word or number, encryption, or callback or other
acknowledgment procedure;
(10) "Settlor" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(11) "Sign" has the same meaning as in Section 32 of this Act;
(12) "State" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(13) "Terms of a trust" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(14) "Trust instrument" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act; and
(15) "Will" has the same meaning as in Section 123 of this Act.
SECTION 42. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 41 to 55 of this Act shall be construed and applied to:
(1) Facilitate electronic estate planning documents and signatures consistent with other law; and
(2) Be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic documents and signatures and continued
expansion of those practices.
SECTION 43. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, Sections 41 to 55 of this Act apply to an electronic
nontestamentary estate planning document and an electronic signature on a nontestamentary estate
planning document.

CHAPTER 134 19
(2) Sections 41 to 55 of this Act do not apply to a nontestamentary estate planning document if the document
precludes use of an electronic record or electronic signature.
(3) Sections 41 to 55 of this Act do not affect the validity of an electronic record or electronic signature that is
valid under:
(a) The Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120; or
(b) The Uniform Electronic Wills Act, Sections 32 to 40 of this Act.
SECTION 44. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The law of this Commonwealth and principles of equity applicable to a nontestamentary estate planning document
apply to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document except as modified by Sections 41 to 55 of this
Act.
SECTION 45. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 41 to 55 of this Act do not require a nontestamentary estate planning document or signature on a
nontestamentary estate planning document to be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, stored,
or otherwise processed or used by electronic means or in electronic form.
(2) A person is not required to have a nontestamentary estate planning document in electronic form or signed
electronically even if the person previously created or signed a nontestamentary estate planning document
by electronic means.
(3) A person may not waive the provisions of this section.
SECTION 46. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A nontestamentary estate planning document or signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document
shall not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.
(2) If any other law of this Commonwealth requires a signature on a nontestamentary estate planning
document to be in writing, an electronic record of the document satisfies the requirement.
(3) If other law of this Commonwealth requires a signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document,
an electronic signature satisfies the requirement.
SECTION 47. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An electronic nontestamentary estate planning document or electronic signature on an electronic
nontestamentary estate planning document is attributable to a person if it was the act of the person. The act
of the person may be shown in any manner, including by showing the efficacy of a security procedure
applied to determine the person to which the electronic record or electronic signature was attributable.
(2) The effect of attribution to a person under subsection (1) of this section of a document or signature is
determined from the context and surrounding circumstances at the time of its creation, execution, or
adoption and as provided by other law.
SECTION 48. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
If other law of this Commonwealth requires a signature or record to be notarized, acknowledged, verified, or made
under oath, the requirement is satisfied with respect to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document if
an individual authorized to perform the notarization, acknowledgment, verification, or oath attaches or logically
associates the individual's electronic signature on the document together with all other information required to be
included under the other law.
SECTION 49. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If any other law of this Commonwealth bases the validity of a nontestamentary estate planning document
on whether it is signed, witnessed, or attested by another individual, the signature, witnessing, or attestation
of that individual may be electronic.
(2) If other law of this Commonwealth bases the validity of a nontestamentary estate planning document on
whether it is signed, witnessed, or attested by another individual in the presence of the individual signing
the document, the presence requirement is satisfied if the individuals are in each other's electronic
presence.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SECTION 50. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if other law of this Commonwealth requires an
electronic nontestamentary estate planning document to be retained, transmitted, copied, or filed, the
requirement is satisfied by retaining, transmitting, copying, or filing an electronic record that:
(a) Accurately reflects the information in the document after it was first generated in final form as an
electronic record or under Section 51 of this Act; and
(b) Remains accessible to the extent required by the other law.
(2) A requirement under subsection (1) of this section to retain a record does not apply to information the sole
purpose of which is to enable the record to be sent, communicated, or received.
(3) A person may satisfy subsection (1) of this section by using the services of another person.
(4) If other law of this Commonwealth requires a nontestamentary estate planning document to be presented or
retained in its original form, or provides consequences if a nontestamentary estate planning document is
not presented or retained in its original form, an electronic record retained in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section satisfies the other law.
(5) This section does not preclude a governmental agency from specifying requirements for the retention of a
record subject to the agency's jurisdiction in addition to those in this section. In this subsection,
"governmental agency" means an executive, legislative, or judicial agency, department, board, commission,
authority, institution, or instrumentality of the federal government or of a state or of a county, municipality,
or other political subdivision of a state.
SECTION 51. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
An individual may create a certified paper copy of an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document by
affirming under penalty of perjury that the paper copy is a complete and accurate copy of the document.
SECTION 52. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Evidence relating to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document or an electronic signature on the
document may not be excluded in a proceeding solely because it is in electronic form.
SECTION 53. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 41 to 55 of this Act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the
law among the jurisdictions that enact it.
SECTION 54. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 41 to 55 of this Act modify, limit, or supersede the Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., as amended, but do not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. sec.
7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003(b).
SECTION 55. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 394 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 41 to 55 of this Act apply to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document created, signed,
generated, sent, received, or stored before, on, or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 56. KRS 64.012 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The county clerk shall receive for the following services the following fees:
(a) 1. Recording and indexing of a:
a. Deed of trust or assignment for the benefit of creditors;
b. Deed;
c. Deed of assignment;
d. File-stamped copy of documents set forth in KRS 14A.2-040(1) or (2) that have been filed
first with the Secretary of State;
e. Real estate option;
f. Power of attorney;

CHAPTER 134 21
g. Revocation of power of attorney;
h. Lease which is recordable by law;
i. Deed of release of a mortgage or lien under KRS 382.360;
j. United States lien;
k. Release of a United States lien;
l. Release of any recorded encumbrance other than state liens;
m. Lis pendens notice concerning proceedings in bankruptcy;
n. Lis pendens notice;
o. Mechanic's and artisan's lien under KRS Chapter 376;
p. Assumed name;
q. Notice of lien issued by the Internal Revenue Service;
r. Notice of lien discharge issued by the Internal Revenue Service;
s. Original, assignment, amendment, or continuation financing statement;
t. Making a record for the establishment of a city, recording the plan or plat thereof, and all
other service incident;
u. Survey of a city, or any part thereof, or any addition to or extensions of the boundary of a
city;
v. Recording with statutory authority for which no specific fee is set, except a military
discharge;
w. Will or other probate document pursuant to KRS Chapter 392 or 394;
x. Court ordered name change pursuant to KRS Chapter 401;
y. Land use restriction according to KRS 100.3681; and
z. Filing with statutory authority for which no specific fee is set.
For all items in this subsection if the entire thereof does not exceed
five (5) pages .............................................................................................. $33.00
And, for all items in this subsection exceeding five (5) pages, except any will or other
probate document pursuant to KRS Chapter 392 or 394 under subdivision w. of this
subparagraph, or any court-ordered name change pursuant to KRS Chapter 401 under
subdivision x. of this subparagraph,
for each additional page ............................................................................... $3.00
And, for all items in this subsection for each additional reference
relating to same instrument .......................................................................... $4.00
2. The thirty-three dollar ($33) fee imposed by this subsection shall be divided as follows:
a. Twenty-seven dollars ($27) shall be retained by the county clerk; and
b. Six dollars ($6) shall be paid to the affordable housing trust fund established in KRS
198A.710 and shall be remitted by the county clerk within ten (10) days following the end
of the quarter in which the fee was received. Each remittance to the affordable housing
trust fund shall be accompanied by a summary report on a form prescribed by the
Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(b) For noting a security interest on a certificate of title pursuant to
KRS Chapter 186A .......................................................................................................... $12.00
(c) For filing the release of collateral under a financing statement
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
and noting same upon the face of the title pursuant to KRS Chapter
186 or 186A $5.00
(d) Filing or recording state tax or other state liens ................................................................. $5.00
(e) Filing release of a state tax or other state lien .................................................................... $5.00
(f) Acknowledging or notarizing any deed, mortgage, power of attorney,
or other written instrument required by law for recording and certifying
same ..................................... .............................................................................................. $5.00
(g) Recording plats, maps, and surveys, not exceeding 24 inches by
36 inches, per page .......................................................................................................... $40.00
(h) Recording a bond, for each bond ..................................................................................... $10.00
(i) Each bond required to be taken or prepared by the clerk ................................................... $4.00
(j) Copy of any bond when ordered ........................................................................................ $3.00
(k) Administering an oath and certificate thereof .................................................................... $5.00
(l) Issuing a license for which no other fee is fixed by law .................................................... $8.00
(m) Issuing a solicitor's license ............................................................................................... $15.00
(n) Marriage license, indexing, recording, and issuing certificate thereof ............................ $26.50
(o) Every order concerning the establishment, changing, closing, or
discontinuing of roads, to be paid out of the county levy when
the road is established, changed, closed, or discontinued, and by
the applicant when it is not ..................................................................................... $3.00
(p) Registration of licenses for professional persons required to register
with the county clerk ............................................................................................. $10.00
(q) Certified copy of any record .............................................................................................. $5.00
Plus fifty cents ($.50) per page after three (3) pages
(r) Filing certification required by KRS 65.070(2)(a) ............................................................. $5.00
(s) Filing notification and declaration and petition of candidates
for Commonwealth's attorney .............................................................................. $200.00
(t) Filing notification and declaration and petition of candidates for county
and independent boards of education .................................................................... $20.00
(u) Filing notification and declaration and petition of candidates for
boards of soil and water conservation districts ..................................................... $20.00
(v) Filing notification and declaration and petition of candidates for
other office ............................................................................................................ $50.00
(w) Filing declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for office ...................................... $50.00
(x) Filing petitions for elections, other than nominating petitions ......................................... $50.00
(y) Notarizing any signature, per signature ............................................................................. $2.00
(z) Filing bond for receiving bodies under KRS 311.310 ..................................................... $10.00
(aa) Noting the assignment of a certificate of delinquency and recording and
indexing the encumbrance under KRS 134.126 or 134.127 .................................. $27.00

CHAPTER 134 23
(ab) Filing a going-out-of-business permit under KRS 365.445 ............................................. $50.00
(ac) Filing a renewal of a going-out-of-business permit under KRS 365.445 ........................ $50.00
(ad) Filing and processing a transient merchant permit under KRS 365.680 .......................... $25.00
(ae) Recording and indexing a real estate mortgage:
1. For a mortgage that does not exceed thirty (30) pages .......................................... $63.00
2. And, for a mortgage that exceeds thirty (30) pages, for each
additional page ......................................................................................................... $3.00
(af) Filing or recording a lien or release of lien by a consolidated local government,
urban-county government, unified local government, or
city of any class ...... ................................................................................................$20.00
(2) The sixty-three dollar ($63) fee imposed by subsection (1)(ae) of this section shall be divided as follows:
(a) Fifty-seven dollars ($57) shall be retained by the county clerk; and
(b) Six dollars ($6) shall be paid to the affordable housing trust fund established in KRS 198A.710 and
shall be remitted by the county clerk within ten (10) days following the end of the quarter in which the
fee was received. Each remittance to the affordable housing trust fund shall be accompanied by a
summary report on a form prescribed by the Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(3) (a) For services related to the permanent storage of records listed in paragraphs (a), (g), (n), and (ae) of
subsection (1) of this section, the clerk shall be entitled to receive a reimbursement of ten dollars ($10).
(b) In counties or a county containing an urban-county government, charter county government, or unified
local government:
1. This fee shall:
a. Not be paid annually to the fiscal court under KRS 64.152;
b. Not be paid to the Finance and Administration Cabinet under KRS 64.345;
c. Be accumulated and transferred to the fiscal court or the legislative body of an urban-
county government on a monthly basis within ten (10) days following the end of the
month;
d. Be maintained by the fiscal court or the legislative body of an urban-county government
in a separate bank account and accounted for in a separate fund; and
e. Not lapse to the general fund of the county or urban-county government.
2. The moneys accumulated from this fee shall be held in perpetuity by the fiscal court or the
legislative body of an urban-county government for the county clerk's exclusive use for:
a. Equipment related to the permanent storage of and access to records, including deed
books, binders, shelves, microfilm equipment, and fireproof equipment;
b. Hardware for the permanent storage of and access to records, including computers,
servers, and scanners;
c. Software for the permanent storage of and access to records, including vendor services
and consumer subscription fees;
d. Personnel costs for the permanent storage of and access to records, including overtime
costs for personnel involved in the digitization of records; and
e. Cloud storage and cybersecurity services for the permanent storage of and access to
records.
3. Notwithstanding KRS 68.275, claims by a county clerk that are for the approved expenditures in
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph shall be paid by the county judge/executive or the chief
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
executive officer of an urban-county government by a warrant drawn on the fund and co-signed
by the treasurer of the county or urban-county government.
4. No later than July 1 of each year, each county fiscal court or legislative body of an urban-county
government shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission detailing the receipts,
expenditures, and any amounts remaining in the fund.
(c) In a county containing a consolidated local government:
1. The fee shall not:
a. Be paid to the Finance and Administration Cabinet under KRS 64.345; or
b. Lapse to the general fund of the consolidated local government.
2. The moneys accumulated from this fee shall be held in perpetuity by the county clerk in a
separate fund to be used exclusively for:
a. Equipment related to the permanent storage of and access to records, including deed
books, binders, shelves, microfilm equipment, and fireproof equipment;
b. Hardware for the permanent storage of and access to records, including computers,
servers, and scanners;
c. Software for the permanent storage of and access to records, including vendor services
and consumer subscription fees;
d. Personnel costs for the permanent storage of and access to records, including overtime
costs for personnel involved in the digitization of records; and
e. Cloud storage and cybersecurity services for the permanent storage of and access to
records.
3. No later than July 1 of each year, the county clerk shall submit a report to the consolidated local
government and the Legislative Research Commission detailing the receipts, expenditures, and
any amounts remaining in the fund.
Section 57. KRS 142.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following taxes shall be paid:
(a) A tax of four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) on each marriage license;
(b) A tax of four dollars ($4) on each power of attorney to convey real or personal property;
(c) A tax of four dollars ($4) on each mortgage, financing statement, or security agreement and on each
notation of a security interest on a certificate of title under KRS 186A.190;
(d) A tax of four dollars ($4) on each conveyance of real property;[ and]
(e) A tax of four dollars ($4) on each lien or conveyance of coal, oil, gas, or other mineral right or
privilege; and
(f) A tax of four dollars ($4) on each recorded will.
(2) Except as provided in Section 4 of this Act, the tax imposed by this section shall be collected by each county
clerk as a prerequisite to the issuance of a marriage license or the original filing of an instrument subject to the
tax. Subsequent assignment of the original instrument shall not be cause for additional taxation under this
section. This section shall not be construed to require any tax upon a deed of release of a lien retained in a
deed or mortgage.
(3) Taxes imposed under this section shall be reported and paid to the Department of Revenue by each county
clerk within ten (10) days following the end of the calendar month in which instruments subject to tax are filed
or marriage licenses issued. Each remittance shall be accompanied by a summary report on a form prescribed
by the department.
(4) Any county clerk who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be subject to the uniform civil
penalties imposed pursuant to KRS 131.180. In every case, any tax not paid on or before the due date shall
bear interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010(6) from the date due until the date of payment.

CHAPTER 134 25
(5) (a) One dollar ($1) of the amount collected under each paragraph of subsection (1) of this section shall be
placed in an agency fund in the Department for Libraries and Archives to be used exclusively for the
purpose of preserving and retaining public records by continuing the local records grant program active
in the Department for Libraries and Archives.
(b) Ninety percent (90%) of all funds allocated to the Department for Libraries and Archives under
paragraph (a) of this subsection for the local records grant program shall be set aside for grants to
county clerks and distributed annually, except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) If there are insufficient grant applications from county clerks for the Department for Libraries and
Archives to distribute ninety percent (90%) of all funds allocated under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the Department for Libraries and Archives may grant those funds to other agencies.
Section 58. KRS 401.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If the District Court, Family Court, or Circuit Court, as authorized by KRS 401.020, orders any person's
name to be changed under this chapter, a copy of the order shall be certified by the clerk of that court to
the county clerk, for record, unless the court has ordered the record sealed or otherwise restricted
from public inspection.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, the clerk of the court shall collect the fee required under Section 56 of
this Act for the filing of a court-ordered name change under subsection (2) of this section and
forward the fee with the copy of the order to the county clerk, except as provided in paragraph (a) of
this subsection.
(2) The county clerk shall keep an alphabetical index for each book of records, referring to the page on which each
person's name change appears, and giving the name from and to which it is changed.
SECTION 59. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 59 to 69 of this Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Claim" means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated,
unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured, or
unsecured;
(2) "Creditor" means, with respect to a transferor, a person who has a claim;
(3) "Debt" means liability on a claim;
(4) "Disposition":
(a) Means a transfer, conveyance, or assignment of property, including a change in the legal ownership
of property occurring upon the substitution of one (1) trustee for another or the addition of one (1) or
more new trustees; and
(b) Includes the exercise of a power so as to cause a transfer of property to a trustee or trustees, but shall
not include the release or relinquishment of an interest in property that, until the release or
relinquishment, was the subject of a qualified disposition;
(5) "Investment advisor" means a person given authority by the terms of a qualified trust to direct, consent to,
or disapprove a transferor's actual or proposed investment decisions, distribution decisions, or other
decisions of the transferor;
(6) "Investment decision" means the retention, purchase, sale, exchange, tender, or other transaction affecting
the ownership of or rights in investments;
(7) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(8) "Property" means anything that may be the subject of ownership, including real property, personal
property, and interests in real or personal property, but does not include any property that is encumbered by
a valid lien;
(9) "Qualified affidavit" means a sworn affidavit signed by the transferor before a disposition of assets to a
qualified trust that meets the requirements of Section 60 of this Act. In the event of a disposition by a
transferor who is a trustee, the affidavit shall be signed by the transferor who made the original disposition
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
to the trustee or a predecessor trustee in a form that meets the requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c) of
subsection (11) of this section and shall state facts as of the time of the original disposition;
(10) "Qualified disposition" means a disposition by or from a transferor with or without consideration to a
qualified trust after the transferor executes a qualified affidavit;
(11) "Qualified trust" means an instrument appointing a qualified trustee or qualified trustees for property that
is the subject of a disposition, which instrument:
(a) Expressly incorporates the law of this Commonwealth to govern the validity, construction, and
administration of the trust;
(b) Is irrevocable; and
(c) Provides that the interest of the transferor or other beneficiary in trust property or income from trust
property may not be transferred, assigned, pledged, or mortgaged, whether voluntarily or
involuntarily, before the qualified trustee or qualified trustees actually distribute property or income
from the trust to the beneficiary;
(12) "Qualified trustee" means a person who:
(a) In the case of a natural person, is a resident of this Commonwealth, or in all other cases, is
authorized by the law of this Commonwealth to act as a trustee and whose activities are subject to
supervision by the Kentucky Department of Financial Institutions, the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, the Comptroller of the Currency, or any successor to those entities;
(b) Maintains or arranges for custody in this Commonwealth of some or all of the property that is the
subject of the qualified disposition, maintains records for the qualified trust on an exclusive or
nonexclusive basis, prepares or arranges for the preparation of required income tax returns for the
qualified trust, or otherwise materially participates in the administration of the qualified trust; and
(c) Is not the transferor;
(13) "Spouse or former spouse" means only persons to whom the transferor was legally married at or before the
time the qualified disposition is made;
(14) "Transferor" means a person who, directly or indirectly, makes a disposition or causes a disposition to be
made in the person's capacity:
(a) As an owner of property;
(b) As a holder of a power of appointment that authorizes the holder to appoint in favor of the holder,
the holder's creditors, the holder's estate, or the creditors of the holder's estate; or
(c) As a trustee; and
(15) "Trustee" means an original, additional, and successor trustee, and a cotrustee, whether singular or plural,
who is a fiduciary relative to any power or duty held by that person that could otherwise be held by a
trustee.
SECTION 60. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A qualified affidavit shall state that:
(1) The transferor has full right, title, and authority to transfer the assets to the trust;
(2) The transfer of the assets to the trust will not render the transferor insolvent;
(3) The transferor does not intend to defraud a creditor by transferring the assets to the trust;
(4) The transferor does not have any pending or threatened court actions against the transferor, except for
those court actions identified by the transferor on an attachment to the affidavit;
(5) The transferor is not involved in any administrative proceedings, except for those administrative
proceedings identified on an attachment to the affidavit;
(6) The transferor does not contemplate filing for relief under the federal bankruptcy code; and
(7) The assets being transferred to the trust were not derived from unlawful activities.
SECTION 61. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:

CHAPTER 134 27
(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including KRS 386B.5-020(7)(a), no action of any kind, including
but not limited to an action to enforce a judgment entered by a court or other body having adjudicative
authority, shall be brought at law or in equity for an attachment or other provisional remedy against
property that is the subject of a qualified disposition to a qualified trust or for the avoidance of a qualified
disposition to a qualified trust, unless:
(a) The action is brought pursuant to the Kentucky Uniform Voidable Transactions Act, KRS 378A.005
to 378A.140; and
(b) The qualified disposition was made with actual intent to defraud a creditor whose claim arose after a
qualified disposition.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 378A.090, a creditor's claim under subsection (1) of this section shall be
extinguished:
1. If the person is a creditor when the qualified disposition to a qualified trust is made, unless the
action is commenced within the later of two (2) years after the qualified disposition is made or
six (6) months after the person discovers or reasonably should have discovered the qualified
disposition; or
2. If the person becomes a creditor after a qualified disposition to a qualified trust is made,
unless the action is commenced within two (2) years after the qualified disposition is made.
(b) Any valid lien attaching to property before a disposition of that property to a trustee of a qualified
trust shall survive the disposition, and the trustee shall take title to the property subject to the valid
lien and subject to any agreements that created or perfected the valid lien. This chapter shall not be
construed to authorize any disposition that is prohibited by the terms of any agreements, notes,
guaranties, mortgages, indentures, instruments, undertakings, or other documents. In the event of
any conflict between this subparagraph and any other provision of this chapter, this subparagraph
shall control.
(c) If paragraph (a) of this subsection applies:
1. A person shall be deemed to have discovered the existence of a qualified disposition to a
qualified trust at the time any public record is made of any transfer of property relative to the
qualified disposition, including but not limited to the conveyance of real property that is
recorded in the office of the county clerk in which the property is located, the filing of a
financing statement under Article 9 of KRS Chapter 355, or the equivalent recording or filing
of either with the appropriate person or official under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this
Commonwealth; and
2. No creditor shall bring an action with respect to property that is the subject of a qualified
disposition unless that creditor proves by clear and convincing evidence that the settlor's
transfer of the property was made with intent to defraud that specific creditor.
(3) For purposes of Sections 59 to 69 of this Act, a qualified disposition that is made by means of a disposition
by a transferor who is a trustee shall be deemed to have been made as of the time the property that is the
subject of the qualified disposition was originally transferred to the transferor acting in the capacity of
trustee, or any predecessor trustee, in a form that meets the requirements of subsection (11)(a) and (c) of
Section 59 of this Act.
(4) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:
(a) A creditor, including a creditor whose claim arose before or after a qualified disposition, or any other
person shall have only the rights with respect to a qualified disposition that are provided in this
section and Section 63 of this Act;
(b) Neither a creditor nor any other person shall have any claim or cause of action against the trustee,
an advisor of a qualified trust, or any person involved in the counseling, drafting, preparation,
execution, or funding of a qualified trust; and
(c) For purposes of this subsection, counseling, drafting, preparation, execution, or funding of a
qualified trust includes the counseling, drafting, preparation, execution, or funding of a limited
partnership or limited liability company if interests in the limited partnership or limited liability
company are subsequently transferred to the qualified trust.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no action of any kind, including but not limited to an action to
enforce a judgment entered by a court or other body having adjudicative authority, shall be brought at law
or in equity against a trustee or an advisor of a qualified trust, or against any person involved in the
counseling, drafting, preparation, execution, or funding of a qualified trust if, as of the date the action is
brought, an action by a creditor with respect to the qualified trust would be barred under this section.
(6) In circumstances where more than one (1) qualified disposition is made by means of the same qualified
trust:
(a) The making of a subsequent qualified disposition shall be disregarded in determining whether a
creditor's claim with respect to a prior qualified disposition is extinguished as provided in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) Any distribution to a beneficiary shall be deemed to have been made from the latest qualified
disposition.
(7) (a) If, in any action brought against a qualified trust, a court takes any action whereby the court declines
to apply the law of this Commonwealth in determining the effect of a spendthrift provision of the
trust:
1. The trustee shall immediately, upon the court's action and without the further order of any
court, cease in all respects to be trustee and a successor trustee shall succeed as trustee in
accordance with the terms of the trust; or
2. If the trust does not provide for a successor trustee and the trust would otherwise be without a
trustee, a court of this Commonwealth, upon the application of any beneficiary of the trust,
shall appoint a successor trustee upon the terms and conditions it determines to be consistent
with the purposes of the trust and Sections 59 to 69 of this Act.
(b) Upon the trustee's ceasing to be trustee, the trustee shall have no power or authority other than to
convey the trust property to the successor trustee named in the trust in accordance with this
subsection.
(8) A qualified trust shall be subject to this section whether or not the transferor retains any or all of the
powers and rights described in Section 68 of this Act or serves as an investment advisor pursuant to Section
66 of this Act.
(9) (a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the limitations on actions by creditors in law or
equity shall not apply, and such creditors' claims shall not be extinguished, if the transferor is
indebted on account of an agreement, judgment, or order of a court for the payment of any of the
following:
1. Past due child support;
2. Past due temporary or permanent maintenance to a spouse or former spouse;
3. A written agreement, judgment, or order of a court for division of marital property of a spouse
or former spouse, but only to the extent of the debt, legally mandated interest on the debt, and
the reasonable cost of collection of the debt; or
4. A valid note, mortgage, security interest, or debt instrument in existence prior to the qualified
disposition.
(b) 1. A claim under this subsection shall be asserted against a trustee only:
a. Upon a final, nonappealable determination of a Kentucky court or a fully domesticated,
final, nonappealable order of a court of another state as defined by Section 116 of this
Act that the debt is past due; and
b. After the court has determined that the claimant has made reasonable attempts to
collect the debt from any other sources of the transferor or that such attempts would be
futile.
2. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the court from making the findings
required in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph in the same proceeding and order.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to any claim for forced heirship, legitime, or elective share.

CHAPTER 134 29
SECTION 62. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A transferor shall only have the powers and rights conferred by the qualified trust. The powers and rights
conferred by the qualified trust upon the transferor are personal powers and rights that may not be exercised by a
creditor or any other person, except as expressly permitted by the trust. Except as permitted by Sections 66 and 68
of this Act, the transferor shall have no rights or authority with respect to the corpus of the qualified trust or the
income from the trust, and any agreement or understanding purporting to grant or permit the retention of any
greater rights or authority shall be void.
SECTION 63. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A qualified disposition to a qualified trust shall be avoided only to the extent necessary to satisfy the
transferor's debt to the creditor at whose instance the disposition was avoided, together with costs, including
attorneys' fees, that the court may allow.
(2) In the event any qualified disposition is avoided as described in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) If the court is satisfied that a qualified trustee has not acted in bad faith in accepting or
administering the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition:
1. The qualified trustee shall have a first and paramount lien against the property that is the
subject of the qualified disposition in an amount equal to the entire cost, including attorneys'
fees, properly incurred by the qualified trustee in defense of the action or proceedings to avoid
the qualified disposition except any valid lien attaching to the property before a disposition of
that property to a trustee of a qualified trust shall survive the disposition, and the trustee shall
take title to the property subject to the valid lien and subject to any agreements that created or
perfected the valid lien;
2. The qualified disposition shall be avoided subject to the proper fees, costs, preexisting rights,
claims, and interests of the qualified trustee and of any predecessor qualified trustee that has
not acted in bad faith; and
3. For purposes of this paragraph, it shall be presumed that the qualified trustee did not act in
bad faith merely by accepting the property; and
(b) 1. If the court is satisfied that a beneficiary of a qualified trust has not acted in bad faith, the
avoidance of the qualified disposition shall be subject to the beneficiary's right to retain any
distribution made upon the exercise of a trust power or discretion vested in the qualified
trustee or qualified trustees of the qualified trust, which power or discretion was properly
exercised prior to the creditor's commencement of an action to avoid a qualified disposition.
2. For purposes of this paragraph, it shall be presumed that the beneficiary, including a
beneficiary who is also a transferor of the trust, did not act in bad faith merely by creating the
trust or by accepting a distribution made in accordance with the terms of the trust.
(3) A disposition by a trustee that is not a qualified trustee to a trustee that is a qualified trustee shall not be
treated as other than a qualified disposition solely because the trust instrument fails to meet the
requirements of subsection (11)(a) of Section 59 of this Act.
(4) In the case of a disposition to more than one (1) trustee, a disposition that is otherwise a qualified
disposition shall not be treated as other than a qualified disposition solely because not all of the recipient
trustees are qualified trustees.
SECTION 64. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A spendthrift provision as described in subsection (11)(c) of Section 59 of this Act shall be deemed to be a
restriction on the transfer of the transferor's beneficial interest in the trust that is enforceable under applicable
nonbankruptcy law within the meaning of 11 U.S.C. sec. 541(c)(2) or any successor provision.
SECTION 65. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of Sections 59 to 69 of this Act, none of the following shall be considered a qualified trustee:
(a) The transferor or any other natural person who is a nonresident of this Commonwealth; or
(b) An entity:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

30 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. That is not authorized by the law of this Commonwealth to act as a trustee; or
2. Whose activities are not subject to supervision as provided in subsection (12)(a) of Section 59
of this Act.
(2) (a) Nothing in Sections 59 to 69 of this Act shall preclude a transferor from appointing one (1) or more
advisors, including but not limited to:
1. Advisors who have authority under the terms of the trust instrument to remove and appoint
qualified trustees or trust advisors;
2. Advisors who have authority under the terms of the trust instrument to direct, consent to, or
disapprove distributions from the trust; or
3. Investment advisors, whether or not the advisors would meet the requirements of subsection
(12) of Section 59 of this Act.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "advisor" includes a trust protector or any other person who, in
addition to a qualified trustee, holds one (1) or more trust powers.
SECTION 66. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A person may serve as an investment advisor notwithstanding that the person is the transferor of the qualified
disposition.
SECTION 67. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In the event that a qualified trustee of a qualified trust ceases to meet the requirements of subsection (12)(a) of
Section 59 of this Act, and there remains no trustee that meets the requirements, the qualified trustee shall be
deemed to have resigned as of the time of that cessation, and thereupon, the successor qualified trustee provided
for in the qualified trust shall become a qualified trustee of the qualified trust, or in the absence of any successor
qualified trustee provided for in the qualified trust, then a court of this Commonwealth shall, upon application of
any interested party, appoint a successor qualified trustee.
SECTION 68. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A qualified trust shall not be deemed revocable on account of its inclusion of one (1) or more of the following:
(1) A transferor's power to veto a distribution from the trust;
(2) A power of appointment, other than a power to appoint to the transferor, the transferor's creditors, the
transferor's estate, or the creditors of the transferor's estate, either exercisable by written instrument of the
transferor during the transferor's life or exercisable by will or other written instrument of the transferor
effective upon the transferor's death;
(3) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income, including rights to the income retained in the trust;
(4) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income or principal from a charitable remainder unitrust or
charitable remainder annuity trust as those terms are defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 664 or any successor
provision;
(5) The transferor's receipt each year of an amount specified in the trust, the amount not to exceed five percent
(5%) of the initial value of the trust or its value determined from time to time pursuant to the trust;
(6) The transferor's potential or actual receipt or use of principal if the potential or actual receipt or use of
principal would be the result of a qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' acting:
(a) In the qualified trustee's or trustees' discretion. For purposes of this subsection, a qualified trustee is
presumed to have discretion with respect to the distribution of principal unless the discretion is
expressly denied to the trustee by the terms of the trust;
(b) Pursuant to a standard that governs the distribution of principal and does not confer upon the
transferor a power to consume, invade, or appropriate property for the benefit of the transferor,
unless the power of the transferor is limited by an ascertainable standard relating to the health,
education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 2041(b)(1)(A) or
2514(c)(1), as amended; or
(c) At the direction of an advisor described in Section 65 of this Act who is acting:
1. In the advisor's discretion; or

CHAPTER 134 31
2. Pursuant to a standard that governs the distribution of principal and does not confer upon the
transferor a power to consume, invade, or appropriate property for the benefit of the
transferor, unless the power of the transferor is limited by an ascertainable standard relating
to the health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec.
2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1), as amended;
(7) The transferor's right to remove a trustee or advisor and to appoint a new trustee or advisor; provided,
however, that the right shall not include the appointment of a person who is a related or subordinate party
with respect to the transferor within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 672(c) or any successor provision;
(8) The transferor's potential or actual use of real property held under a qualified personal residence trust
within the meaning of the term as described in 26 U.S.C. sec. 2702(c) or any successor provision;
(9) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income or principal to pay, in whole or in part, income taxes
due on income of the trust if the potential or actual receipt of income or principal is pursuant to a provision
in the trust instrument that expressly permits a distribution to the transferor as reimbursement for such
taxes and if the distribution would be the result of a qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' acting:
(a) In the qualified trustee's or trustees' discretion or pursuant to a mandatory direction in the trust
instrument; or
(b) At the direction of an advisor described in Section 65 of this Act who is acting in that advisor's
discretion;
(10) The ability, whether pursuant to direction in the qualified trust or discretion of a qualified trustee to pay,
after the death of the transferor, all or any part of the debts of the transferor outstanding at the time of the
transferor's death, the expenses of administering the transferor's estate, or any estate or inheritance tax
imposed on or with respect to the transferor's estate; or
(11) A qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' authority to make distributions to pay taxes in lieu of or in
addition to the power to make a distribution for taxes pursuant to subsections (3), (6), (9), or (10) of this
section by direct payment to taxing authorities.
SECTION 69. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 386 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 59 to 69 of this Act shall apply to qualified dispositions to qualified trusts and dispositions by transferors
who are trustees made on or after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 70. SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS ESTABLISHED, AND A NEW
SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Breach of trust" includes a violation by a trust director or trustee of a duty imposed on that director or
trustee by the terms of the trust, the provisions of Sections 70 to 86 of this Act, or other law of this
Commonwealth pertaining to trusts;
(2) "Directed trust" means a trust for which the terms of the trust grant a power of direction;
(3) "Directed trustee" means a trustee that is subject to a trust director's power of direction;
(4) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(5) "Power of direction" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(6) "Settlor" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(7) "State" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(8) "Terms of a trust" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(9) "Trust director" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act; and
(10) "Trustee" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act.
SECTION 71. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

32 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Sections 70 to 86 of this Act apply to a trust, whenever created, that has its principal place of administration in this
Commonwealth, subject to the following rules:
(1) If the trust was created before the effective date of this Act, Sections 70 to 86 of this Act apply only to a
decision or action occurring on or after the effective date of this Act; and
(2) If the principal place of administration of the trust is changed to this Commonwealth on or after the
effective date of this Act, Sections 70 to 86 of this Act apply only to a decision or action occurring on or
after the date of the change.
SECTION 72. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The common law and principles of equity supplement the provisions of Sections 70 to 86 of this Act, except to the
extent modified by Sections 70 to 86 of this Act or another statute of this Commonwealth.
SECTION 73. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "power of appointment" means a power that enables a person acting in a
nonfiduciary capacity to designate a recipient of an ownership interest in or another power of appointment
over trust property.
(2) The provisions of Sections 70 to 86 of this Act shall not apply to a:
(a) Power of appointment;
(b) Power to appoint or remove a trustee or trust director;
(c) Power of a settlor over a trust to the extent the settlor has a power to revoke the trust;
(d) Power of a beneficiary over a trust to the extent the exercise or nonexercise of the power affects the
beneficial interest of:
1. The beneficiary; or
2. Another beneficiary represented by the beneficiary under KRS 386B.3-010 to 386B.3-050 with
respect to the exercise or nonexercise of the power; or
(e) Power over a trust if:
1. The terms of the trust provide that the power is held in a nonfiduciary capacity; and
2. The power must be held in a nonfiduciary capacity to achieve the settlor's tax objectives under
the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and regulations issued
thereunder, as amended.
(3) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, a power granted to a person to designate a recipient of an
ownership interest in or power of appointment over trust property which is exercisable while the person is
not serving as a trustee is a power of appointment and not a power of direction.
SECTION 74. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to Section 75 of this Act, the terms of a trust may grant a power of direction to a trust director.
(2) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise:
(a) A trust director may exercise any further power appropriate to the exercise or nonexercise of power
of direction granted to the director under subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Trust directors with joint powers shall act by majority decision.
SECTION 75. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A trust director is subject to the same rules as a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances in the
exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction or further power under subsection (2)(a) of Section 74 of this Act
regarding:

CHAPTER 134 33
(1) A payback provision in the terms of a trust necessary to comply with the reimbursement requirements of
Medicaid law in Section 1917 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A), as amended, and
regulations issued thereunder, as amended; and
(2) A charitable interest in the trust, including notice regarding the interest to the Attorney General.
SECTION 76. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, with respect to a power of direction or further power under
subsection (2)(a) of Section 74 of this Act:
(a) A trust director has the same fiduciary duty and liability in the exercise or nonexercise of the power:
1. If the power is held individually, as a sole trustee in a like position and under similar
circumstances; or
2. If the power is held jointly with a trustee or another trust director, as a cotrustee in like
position and under similar circumstances; and
(b) The terms of the trust may vary the director's duty or liability to the same extent the terms of the trust
could vary the duty or liability of a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.
(2) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, if a trust director is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized
or permitted by law other than the provisions of Sections 70 to 86 of this Act to provide health care in the
ordinary course of the director's business or practice of a profession, to the extent the director acts in that
capacity, the director shall have no duty or liability under Sections 70 to 86 of this Act.
(3) The terms of a trust may impose a duty or liability on a trust director in addition to the duties and liabilities
under this section.
SECTION 77. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a directed trustee shall take reasonable action to comply with a
trust director's exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction or further power under subsection (2)(a) of
Section 74 of this Act, and the trustee is not liable for the action.
(2) A directed trustee shall not comply with a trust director's exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction or
further power under Section 74 of this Act to the extent that by complying, the trustee would engage in
willful misconduct.
(3) An exercise of a power of direction under which a trust director may release a trustee or another trust
director from liability for breach of trust is not effective if:
(a) The breach involved the trustee's or other director's willful misconduct;
(b) The release was induced by improper conduct of the trustee or other director in procuring the
release; or
(c) At the time of the release, the director did not know the material facts relating to the breach.
(4) A directed trustee that has reasonable doubt about its duty under this section may petition a court with
jurisdiction under Subchapter 2 of KRS Chapter 386B for instructions.
(5) The terms of a trust may impose a duty or liability on a directed trustee in addition to the duties and
liabilities under this section.
SECTION 78. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to Section 79 of this Act, a trustee shall provide information to a trust director to the extent the
information is reasonably related to both:
(a) The powers or duties of the trustee; and
(b) The powers or duties of the director.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

34 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) Subject to Section 79 of this Act, a trust director shall provide information to a trustee or another trust
director to the extent the information is reasonably related to both:
(a) The powers or duties of the director; and
(b) The powers or duties of the trustee or other director.
(3) A trustee that acts in reliance on information provided by a trust director is not liable for breach of trust to
the extent the breach resulted from the reliance, unless by so acting the trust director engages in willful
misconduct.
(4) A trust director that acts in reliance on information provided by a trustee or another trust director is not
liable for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance, unless by so acting the trust
director engages in willful misconduct.
SECTION 79. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise:
(a) The trustee shall not have a duty to:
1. Monitor a trust director; or
2. Inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or trust director concerning an instance
in which the trustee might have acted differently than the director; and
(b) By taking an action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a trustee does not assume the duty
excluded by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise:
(a) The trust director shall not have a duty to:
1. Monitor a trustee or another trust director; or
2. Inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or another trust director concerning an
instance in which the director might have acted differently than a trustee or another director;
and
(b) By taking an action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a trust director does not assume
the duty excluded by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 80. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The terms of a trust may relieve a cotrustee from duty and liability with respect to another cotrustee's exercise or
nonexercise of a power of the other cotrustee to the same extent that in a directed trust a directed trustee is
relieved from duty and liability with respect to a trust director's power under Sections 77, 78, and 79 of this Act.
SECTION 81. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An action against a trust director for breach of trust shall be commenced within the same limitation period
as under KRS 386B.10-050 for an action for breach of trust against a trustee in a like position and under
similar circumstances.
(2) A report or accounting has the same effect on the limitation period for an action against a trust director for
breach of trust that the report or accounting would have under KRS 386B.10-050 in an action for breach of
trust against a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.
SECTION 82. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In an action against a trust director for breach of trust, the director may assert the same defenses a trustee in a
like position and under similar circumstances could assert in an action for breach of trust against the trustee.
SECTION 83. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:

CHAPTER 134 35
(1) By accepting appointment as a trust director of a trust subject to the provisions of Sections 70 to 86 of this
Act, the director submits to personal jurisdiction of the courts of this Commonwealth regarding any matter
related to a power or duty of the director.
(2) This section shall not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trust director.
SECTION 84. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, the rules applicable to a trustee apply to a trust director regarding
the following matters:
(1) Acceptance under KRS 386B.7-010;
(2) Giving of bond to secure performance under KRS 386B.7-020;
(3) Reasonable compensation under KRS 386B.7-080;
(4) Resignation under KRS 386B.7-050;
(5) Removal under KRS 386B.7-060; and
(6) Vacancy and appointment of successor under KRS 386B.7-040.
SECTION 85. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 75 to 86 of this Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote
uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
SECTION 86. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The provisions of Sections 70 to 86 of this Act modify, limit, or supersede the Electronic Signatures in Global and
National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., but do not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001(c)
or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003(b).
SECTION 87. SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS ESTABLISHED, AND A NEW
SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Appointive property" means the property or property interest subject to a power of appointment;
(2) "Ascertainable standard" means the same as in Section 116 of this Act;
(3) "Authorized fiduciary" means:
(a) A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has discretion to distribute or direct a trustee to
distribute part or all of the principal of the first trust to one (1) or more current beneficiaries;
(b) A special fiduciary appointed under Section 94 of this Act; or
(c) A special needs fiduciary under Section 98 of this Act;
(4) "Beneficiary" means a person that:
(a) Has a present or future, vested or contingent, beneficial interest in a trust;
(b) Holds a power of appointment over trust property; or
(c) Is an identified charitable organization that will or may receive distributions under the terms of the
trust;
(5) "Charitable interest" means an interest in a trust which:
(a) Is held by an identified charitable organization and makes the organization a qualified beneficiary;
(b) Benefits only charitable organizations and, if the interest were held by an identified charitable
organization, would make the organization a qualified beneficiary; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

36 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Is held solely for charitable purposes and, if the interest were held by an identified charitable
organization, would make the organization a qualified beneficiary;
(6) "Charitable organization" means:
(a) A person, other than an individual, organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes; or
(b) A government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, to the extent it holds funds
exclusively for a charitable purpose;
(7) "Charitable purpose" means the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion
of health, a municipal or other governmental purpose, or another purpose the achievement of which is
beneficial to the community;
(8) "Court" means a court in this Commonwealth having jurisdiction in matters relating to trusts under
Subchapter 2 of this chapter;
(9) "Current beneficiary":
(a) Means a beneficiary that on the date of the beneficiary's qualification is determined is a distributee
or permissible distributee of trust income or principal; and
(b) Includes the holder of a presently exercisable general power of appointment but does not include a
person that is a beneficiary only because the person holds any other power of appointment;
(10) "Decanting power" or "the decanting power" means the power of an authorized fiduciary under Sections
70 to 86 of this Act to distribute property of a first trust to one (1) or more second trusts or to modify the
terms of the first trust;
(11) "Expanded distributive discretion" means a discretionary power of distribution that is not limited to an
ascertainable standard or a reasonably definite standard;
(12) "First trust" means a trust over which an authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power;
(13) "First-trust instrument" means the trust instrument for a first trust;
(14) "General power of appointment" means a power of appointment exercisable in favor of a powerholder, the
powerholder's estate, a creditor of the powerholder, or a creditor of the powerholder's estate;
(15) "Jurisdiction" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(16) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(17) "Power of appointment":
(a) Means a power that enables a powerholder acting in a nonfiduciary capacity to designate a recipient
of an ownership interest in or another power of appointment over the appointive property; and
(b) Does not include a power of attorney;
(18) "Powerholder" means a person in which a donor creates a power of appointment;
(19) "Presently exercisable power of appointment" means a power of appointment exercisable by the
powerholder at the relevant time and:
(a) Includes a power of appointment exercisable only after the occurrence of a specified event, the
satisfaction of an ascertainable standard, or the passage of a specified time only after:
1. The occurrence of the specified event;
2. The satisfaction of the ascertainable standard; or
3. The passage of the specified time; and
(b) Does not include a power exercisable only at the powerholder's death;
(20) "Qualified beneficiary" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(21) "Reasonably definite standard" means a clearly measurable standard under which a holder of a power of
distribution is legally accountable within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 674(b)(5)(A), as amended, and any
applicable regulations;
(22) "Record" has the same meaning as in Section 32 of this Act;

CHAPTER 134 37
(23) "Second-trust instrument" means the trust instrument for a second trust;
(24) "Settlor," except as otherwise provided in Section 110 of this Act, has the same meaning as in Section 116
of this Act;
(25) "Sign" has the same meaning as in Section 32 of this Act;
(26) "State" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act;
(27) "Terms of the trust" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act; and
(28) "Trust instrument" has the same meaning as in Section 116 of this Act.
SECTION 88. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the provisions of Sections 87 to 114
of this Act shall apply to an express trust that is irrevocable or revocable by the settlor only with the consent
of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.
(2) Sections 87 to 114 of this Act shall not apply to a trust held solely for charitable purposes.
(3) Subject to Section 100 of this Act, a trust instrument may restrict or prohibit exercise of the decanting
power.
(4) Sections 87 to 114 of this Act do not limit the power of a trustee, powerholder, or other person to distribute
or appoint property in further trust or to modify a trust under the trust instrument, statutes of this
Commonwealth other than the provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act, common law, a court order, or a
nonjudicial settlement agreement.
(5) Sections 87 to 114 of this Act do not affect the ability of a settlor to provide in a trust instrument for the
distribution of the trust property or appointment in further trust of the trust property or for modification of
the trust instrument.
SECTION 89. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In exercising the decanting power, an authorized fiduciary shall act in accordance with its fiduciary duties,
including the duty to act in accordance with the purposes of the first trust.
(2) Sections 87 to 114 of this Act do not create or imply a duty to exercise the decanting power or to inform the
beneficiaries about the applicability of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in a first-trust instrument, for purposes of Sections 70 to 86 of this Act and
KRS 386B.8-010 and 386B.8-020, the terms of the first trust are deemed to include the decanting power.
SECTION 90. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 87 to 114 of this Act shall apply to a trust created before, on, or after the effective date of this Act which:
(1) Has its principal place of administration in this Commonwealth, including a trust whose principal place of
administration has been changed to this Commonwealth; or
(2) Provides by its trust instrument that it is governed by the law of this Commonwealth or is governed by the
law of this Commonwealth for the purpose of:
(a) Administration, including administration of a trust whose governing law for purposes of
administration has been changed to the law of this Commonwealth;
(b) Construction of the terms of the trust; or
(c) Determining the meaning or effect of terms of the trust.
SECTION 91. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A trustee or other person that reasonably relies on the validity of a distribution of part or all of the property of a
trust to another trust, or a modification of a trust, under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act, statutes of this
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

38 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Commonwealth other than Sections 87 to 114 of this Act, or the law of another jurisdiction is not liable to any
person for any action or failure to act as a result of the reliance.
SECTION 92. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A notice period in this section begins on the day notice is given under subsection (3) of this section and ends
fifty-nine (59) days after the day notice is given.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 87 to 114 of this Act, an authorized fiduciary may exercise the
decanting power without the consent of any person and without court approval.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, an authorized fiduciary shall give notice in a
record of the intended exercise of the decanting power not less than sixty (60) days before the exercise to:
(a) Each settlor of the first trust, if living or then in existence;
(b) Each qualified beneficiary of the first trust;
(c) Each holder of a presently exercisable power of appointment over any part or all of the first trust;
(d) Each person that currently has the right to remove or replace the authorized fiduciary;
(e) Each other fiduciary of the first trust;
(f) Each fiduciary of the second trust; and
(g) The Attorney General, if subsection (2) of Section 99 of this Act applies.
(4) An authorized fiduciary is not required to give notice under subsection (3) of this section to a person that is
not known to the fiduciary or is known to the fiduciary but cannot be located by the fiduciary after
reasonable diligence.
(5) A notice under subsection (3) of this section shall:
(a) Specify the manner in which the authorized fiduciary intends to exercise the decanting power;
(b) Specify the proposed effective date for exercise of the power; and
(c) Include a copy of:
1. The first-trust instrument; or
2. All second-trust instruments.
(6) The decanting power may be exercised before the expiration of the notice period under subsection (1) of
this section if all persons entitled to receive notice waive the period in a signed record.
(7) The receipt of notice, waiver of the notice period, or expiration of the notice period does not affect the right
of a person to file an application under Section 94 of this Act asserting that:
(a) An attempted exercise of the decanting power is ineffective because it did not comply with the
provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act or was an abuse of discretion or breach of fiduciary duty;
or
(b) Section 107 of this Act applies to the exercise of the decanting power.
(8) An exercise of the decanting power is not ineffective because of the failure to give notice to one (1) or more
persons under subsection (3) of this section if the authorized fiduciary acted with reasonable care to comply
with subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 93. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notice to a person with authority to represent and bind another person under a first-trust instrument or the
provisions of this chapter has the same effect as notice given directly to the person represented.
(2) Consent of or waiver by a person with authority to represent and bind another person under a first-trust
instrument or the provisions of this chapter is binding on the person represented unless the person
represented objects to the representation before the consent or waiver otherwise would become effective.

CHAPTER 134 39
(3) A person with authority to represent and bind another person under a first-trust instrument or the
provisions of this chapter may file an application under Section 94 of this Act on behalf of the person
represented.
(4) A settlor may not bind or represent a beneficiary under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act.
SECTION 94. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) On application of an authorized fiduciary, a person entitled to notice under subsection (3) of Section 92 of
this Act, a beneficiary, or with respect to a charitable interest, the Attorney General or other person that has
standing to enforce the charitable interest, the court may:
(a) Provide instructions to the authorized fiduciary regarding whether a proposed exercise of the
decanting power is permitted under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act and consistent with the fiduciary
duties of the authorized fiduciary;
(b) Appoint a special fiduciary and authorize the special fiduciary to determine whether the decanting
power should be exercised under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act and to exercise the decanting power;
(c) Approve an exercise of the decanting power;
(d) Determine that a proposed or attempted exercise of the decanting power is ineffective because:
1. After applying Section 107 of this Act, the proposed or attempted exercise does not or did not
comply with the provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act; or
2. The proposed or attempted exercise would be or was an abuse of fiduciary's discretion or a
breach of fiduciary duty;
(e) Determine the extent to which Section 107 of this Act applies to a prior exercise of the decanting
power;
(f) Provide instructions to the trustee regarding the application of Section 107 of this Act to a prior
exercise of the decanting power; or
(g) Order other relief to carry out the purposes of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act.
(2) On application of an authorized fiduciary, the court may approve:
(a) An increase in the fiduciary's compensation under Section 101 of this Act; or
(b) A modification under Section 103 of this Act of a provision granting a person the right to remove or
replace the fiduciary.
SECTION 95. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An exercise of the decanting power shall be made in a record signed by an authorized fiduciary. The signed record
shall, directly or by reference to the notice required by Section 92 of this Act, identify the first trust and the second
trust or trusts and state the property of the first trust being distributed to each second trust and the property, if any,
that remains in the first trust.
SECTION 96. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Noncontingent right" means a right that is not subject to the exercise of discretion or the
occurrence of a specified event that is not certain to occur. The term does not include a right held by
a beneficiary if any person has discretion to distribute property subject to the right to any person
other than the beneficiary or the beneficiary's estate;
(b) "Presumptive remainder beneficiary" means a qualified beneficiary other than a current
beneficiary;
(c) "Successor beneficiary" means a beneficiary that is not a qualified beneficiary on the date the
beneficiary's qualification is determined. The term does not include a person that is a beneficiary
only because the person holds a nongeneral power of appointment; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

40 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) "Vested interest" means:
1. A right to a mandatory distribution that is a noncontingent right as of the date of the exercise
of the decanting power;
2. A current and noncontingent right, annually or more frequently, to a mandatory distribution
of income, a specified dollar amount, or a percentage of value of some or all of the trust
property;
3. A current and noncontingent right, annually or more frequently, to withdraw income, a
specified dollar amount, or a percentage of value of some or all of the trust property;
4. A presently exercisable general power of appointment; or
5. A right to receive an ascertainable part of the trust property on the trust's termination which is
not subject to the exercise of discretion or to the occurrence of a specified event that is not
certain to occur.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and Section 99 of this Act, an authorized fiduciary that has
expanded distributive discretion over the principal of a first trust for the benefit of one (1) or more current
beneficiaries may exercise the decanting power over the principal of the first trust.
(3) Subject to Section 98 of this Act, in an exercise of the decanting power under this section, a second trust
shall not:
(a) Include as a current beneficiary a person that is not a current beneficiary of the first trust, except as
otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Include as a presumptive remainder beneficiary or successor beneficiary a person that is not a
current beneficiary, presumptive remainder beneficiary, or successor beneficiary of the first trust,
except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section; or
(c) Reduce or eliminate a vested interest.
(4) Subject to subsection (3)(c) of this section and Section 99 of this Act, in an exercise of the decanting power
under this section, a second trust may be a trust created or administered under the law of any jurisdiction
and may:
(a) Retain a power of appointment granted in the first trust;
(b) Omit a power of appointment granted in the first trust, other than a presently exercisable general
power of appointment;
(c) Create or modify a power of appointment if the powerholder is a current beneficiary of the first trust
and the authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion to distribute principal to the
beneficiary; and
(d) Create or modify a power of appointment if the powerholder is a presumptive remainder beneficiary
or successor beneficiary of the first trust, but the exercise of the power may take effect only after the
powerholder becomes, or would have become if then living, a current beneficiary.
(5) A power of appointment described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of subsection (4) of this section may be general
or nongeneral. The class of permissible appointees in favor of which the power may be exercised may be
broader than or different from the beneficiaries of the first trust.
(6) If an authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion over part but not all of the principal of a first
trust, the fiduciary may exercise the decanting power under this section over that part of the principal over
which the authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion.
SECTION 97. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "limited distributive discretion" means a discretionary power of distribution that is
limited to an ascertainable standard or a reasonably definite standard.
(2) An authorized fiduciary that has limited distributive discretion over the principal of the first trust for the
benefit of one (1) or more current beneficiaries may exercise the decanting power over the principal of the
first trust.

CHAPTER 134 41
(3) Under this section and subject to Section 99 of this Act, a second trust may be created or administered
under the law of any jurisdiction. Under this section, the second trusts, in the aggregate, shall grant each
beneficiary of the first trust beneficial interests which are substantially similar to the beneficial interests of
the beneficiary of the first trust.
(4) A power to make a distribution under a second trust for the benefit of a beneficiary who is an individual is
substantially similar to a power under the first trust to make a distribution directly to the beneficiary. A
distribution is for the benefit of a beneficiary if:
(a) The distribution is applied for the benefit of the beneficiary;
(b) The beneficiary is under a legal disability or the trustee reasonably believes the beneficiary is
incapacitated, and the distribution is made as permitted under this chapter; or
(c) The distribution is made as permitted under the terms of the first-trust instrument and the second-
trust instrument for the benefit of the beneficiary.
(5) If an authorized fiduciary has limited distributive discretion over part but not all of the principal of a first
trust, the fiduciary may exercise the decanting power under this section over that part of the principal over
which the authorized fiduciary has limited distributive discretion.
SECTION 98. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Beneficiary with a disability" means a beneficiary of a first trust who the special needs fiduciary
believes may qualify for governmental benefits based on disability, whether or not the beneficiary
currently receives those benefits or is an in individual who has been adjudicated incompetent;
(b) "Governmental benefits" means financial aid or services from a state, federal, or other public
agency;
(c) "Special needs fiduciary" means, with respect to a trust that has a beneficiary with a disability:
1. A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has discretion to distribute part or all of
the principal of a first trust to one (1) or more current beneficiaries;
2. If no trustee or fiduciary has discretion under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, a trustee or
other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has discretion to distribute part or all of the income
of the first trust to one (1) or more current beneficiaries; or
3. If no trustee or beneficiary has discretion under subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph, a
trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that is required to distribute part or all of the
income or principal of the first trust to one (1) or more current beneficiaries; and
(d) "Special needs trust" means a trust that the trustee believes would not be considered a resource for
purposes of determining whether a beneficiary with a disability is eligible for governmental benefits.
(2) A special needs fiduciary may exercise the decanting power in Section 96 of this Act over the principal of
the first trust as if the fiduciary had authority to distribute principal to a beneficiary with a disability subject
to expanded distributive discretion if:
(a) A second trust is a special needs trust that benefits the beneficiary with a disability; and
(b) The special needs fiduciary determines that exercise of the decanting power will further the purposes
of the first trust.
(3) In an exercise of the decanting power under this section, the following rules apply:
(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of Section 96 of this Act, the interest in the second trust of a
beneficiary with a disability may:
1. Be a pooled trust as defined by Medicaid law for the benefit of the beneficiary with a disability
under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A), as amended; or
2. Contain payback provisions complying with reimbursement requirements of Medicaid law
under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A), as amended;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

42 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Subsection (3)(c) of Section 96 of this Act shall not apply to the interests of the beneficiary with a
disability; and
(c) Except as affected by any change to the interests of the beneficiary with a disability, the second trust,
or if there are two (2) or more second trusts, the second trusts in the aggregate, shall grant each
other beneficiary of the first trust beneficial interests in the second trust which are substantially
similar to the beneficiary's beneficial interests in the first trust.
SECTION 99. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Determinable charitable interest" means a charitable interest that is a right to a mandatory
distribution currently, periodically, on the occurrence of a specified event, or after the passage of a
specified time and which is unconditional or will be held solely for charitable purposes; and
(b) "Unconditional" means not subject to the occurrence of a specified event that is not certain to occur,
other than a requirement in a trust instrument that a charitable organization be in existence or
qualify under a particular provision of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, on the date of the distribution, if the charitable organization meets the requirement on the
date of determination.
(2) If a first trust contains a determinable charitable interest, the Attorney General has the rights of a qualified
beneficiary and may represent and bind the charitable interest.
(3) If a first trust contains a charitable interest, the second trust or trusts shall not:
(a) Diminish the charitable interest;
(b) Diminish the interest of an identified charitable organization that holds the charitable interest;
(c) Alter any charitable purpose stated in the first-trust instrument; or
(d) Alter any condition or restriction related to the charitable interest.
(4) If there are two (2) or more second trusts, the second trusts shall be treated as one (1) trust for purposes of
determining whether the exercise of the decanting power diminishes the charitable interest or diminishes
the interest of an identified charitable organization for purposes of subsection (3) of this section.
(5) If a first trust contains a determinable charitable interest, the second trust or trusts that include a charitable
interest pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall be administered under the law of this
Commonwealth unless:
(a) The Attorney General, after having received notice under Section 92 of this Act, fails to object in a
signed record delivered to the authorized fiduciary within the notice period;
(b) The Attorney General consents in a signed record to the second trust or trusts being administered
under the law of another jurisdiction; or
(c) The court approves the exercise of the decanting power.
(6) Sections 87 to 114 of this Act do not limit the powers and duties of the Attorney General under the law of
this Commonwealth other than the provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act.
SECTION 100. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to the extent the first-trust instrument
expressly prohibits the exercise of:
(a) The decanting power; or
(b) A power granted by state law to the fiduciary to distribute part or all of the principal of the trust to
another trust or to modify the trust.
(2) Exercise of the decanting power is subject to any restriction in the first-trust instrument that expressly
applies to the exercise of:
(a) The decanting power; or

CHAPTER 134 43
(b) A power granted by state law to a fiduciary to distribute part or all of the principal of the trust to
another trust or to modify the trust.
(3) A general prohibition of the amendment or revocation of a first trust, a spendthrift clause, or a clause
restraining the voluntary or involuntary transfer of a beneficiary's interest does not preclude exercise of the
decanting power.
(4) Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power
under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act even if the first-trust instrument permits the authorized fiduciary or
another person to modify the first-trust instrument or to distribute part or all of the principal of the first
trust to another trust.
(5) If a first-trust instrument contains an express prohibition described in subsection (1) of this section or an
express restriction described in subsection (2) of this section, the provision shall be included in the second-
trust instrument.
SECTION 101. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a first-trust instrument specifies an authorized fiduciary's compensation, the fiduciary may not exercise
the decanting power to increase the fiduciary's compensation above the specified compensation unless:
(a) All qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to the increase in a signed record; or
(b) The increase is approved by the court.
(2) If a first-trust instrument does not specify an authorized fiduciary's compensation, the fiduciary may not
exercise the decanting power to increase the fiduciary's compensation above the compensation permitted by
this chapter unless:
(a) All qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to the increase in a signed record; or
(b) The increase is approved by the court.
(3) A change in an authorized fiduciary's compensation which is incidental to other changes made by the
exercise of the decanting power is not an increase in the fiduciary's compensation for purposes of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
SECTION 102. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a second-trust instrument may not relieve an authorized
fiduciary from liability for breach of trust to a greater extent than the first-trust instrument.
(2) A second-trust instrument may provide for indemnification of an authorized fiduciary of the first trust or
another person acting in a fiduciary capacity under the first trust for any liability or claim that would have
been payable from the first trust if the decanting power had not been exercised.
(3) A second-trust instrument may not reduce fiduciary liability in the aggregate.
(4) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a second-trust instrument may divide and reallocate fiduciary
powers among the fiduciaries, including one (1) or more trustees, distribution advisors, investment advisors,
trust protectors, or other persons, and relieve a fiduciary from liability for an act or failure to act of another
fiduciary as permitted by law of this Commonwealth other than Sections 87 to 114 of this Act.
SECTION 103. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to modify a provision in a first-trust instrument
granting another person power to remove or replace the fiduciary unless:
(1) The person holding the power consents to the modification in a signed record and the modification applies
only to that person;
(2) The person holding the power and the qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to the modification
in a signed record and the modification grants a substantially similar power to another person; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

44 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) The court approves the modification and the modification grants a substantially similar power to another
person.
SECTION 104. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Grantor trust" means a trust as to which a settlor of a first trust is considered the owner under 26
U.S.C. secs. 671 to 677, as amended, or 26 U.S.C. sec. 679, as amended;
(b) "Internal Revenue Code" means the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(c) "Nongrantor trust" means a trust that is not a grantor trust; and
(d) "Qualified benefits property" means property subject to the minimum distribution requirements of
26 U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(9), as amended, and any applicable regulations, or to any similar requirements
that refer to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(9) or the regulations.
(2) An exercise of the decanting power is subject to the following limitations:
(a) If a first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of Sections
87 to 114 of this Act other than this section, for a marital deduction for purposes of the gift or estate
tax under the Internal Revenue Code or a state gift, estate, or inheritance tax, the second-trust
instrument shall not include or omit any term that, if included in or omitted from the trust instrument
for the trust to which the property was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from
qualifying for the deduction, or would have reduced the amount of the deduction, under the same
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or state law under which the transfer qualified;
(b) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of
Sections 87 to 114 of this Act other than this section, for a charitable deduction for purposes of the
income, gift, or estate tax under the Internal Revenue Code or a state income, gift, estate, or
inheritance tax, the second-trust instrument shall not include or omit any term that, if included from
or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would have
prevented the transfer from qualifying for the deduction, or would have reduced the amount of the
deduction, under the same provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or state law under which the
transfer qualified;
(c) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of
Sections 87 to 114 of this Act other than this section, for the exclusion from the gift tax described in:
1. 26 U.S.C. sec. 2503(b), as amended, the second-trust instrument shall not include or omit a
term that, if included in or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property
was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. sec.
2503(b), as amended; or
2. 26 U.S.C. sec. 2503(c), as amended, the second-trust instrument shall not include or omit a
term that, if included in or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property
was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. sec.
2503(c), as amended;
(d) If the property of the first trust includes shares of stock in an S corporation as defined in 26 U.S.C.
sec. 1361, as amended, and the first trust is, or but for provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act
other than this section would be, a permitted shareholder under any provision of 26 U.S.C. sec. 1361,
as amended, an authorized fiduciary may exercise the power with respect to part of all the S
corporation stock only if any second trust receiving the stock is a permitted shareholder under 26
U.S.C. sec. 1361(c)(2), as amended. If the property of the first trust includes shares of stock in an S
corporation and the first trust is, or but for provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act other than this
section would be, a qualified subchapter S trust within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 1361(d), as
amended, the second-trust instrument shall not include or omit a term that prevents the second trust
from qualifying as a qualified subchapter S trust;
(e) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of
Sections 87 to 114 of this Act other than this section, for a zero inclusion ratio for purposes of the
generation-skipping transfer tax under 26 U.S.C. sec. 2642(c), as amended, the second-trust
instrument shall not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the first-trust

CHAPTER 134 45
instrument, would have prevented the transfer to the first trust from qualifying for a zero inclusion
ratio under 26 U.S.C. sec. 2642(c), as amended;
(f) If the first trust is directly or indirectly the beneficiary of qualified benefits property, the second-trust
instrument shall not include or omit any term that, if included in or omitted from the first-trust
instrument, would have increased the minimum distributions required with respect to the qualified
benefits property under 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(9), as amended, and any applicable regulations, or any
similar requirements that refer to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(9), as amended, or the regulations. If an
attempted exercise of the decanting power violates the preceding sentence, the trustee is deemed to
have held the qualified benefits property and any reinvested distributions of the property as a
separate share from the date of the exercise of the power, and Section 107 of this Act applies to the
separate share;
(g) If the first trust qualifies as a grantor trust because of the application of 26 U.S.C. sec. 672(f)(2)(A),
as amended, the second trust shall not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the
first-trust instrument, would have prevented the first trust from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. sec.
672(f)(2)(A), as amended;
(h) As used in this paragraph, "tax benefit" means a federal or state tax deduction, exemption,
exclusion, or other benefit not otherwise listed in this section, except for a benefit arising from being
a grantor trust. Subject to paragraph (i) of this subsection, a second-trust instrument shall not
include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the first-trust instrument, would have
prevented qualification for a tax benefit if:
1. The first-trust instrument expressly indicates an intent to qualify for the benefit or the first-
trust instrument clearly is designed to enable the first trust to qualify for the benefit; and
2. The transfer of property held by the first trust or the first trust qualified, or but for the
provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act other than this section, would have qualified for
the tax benefit;
(i) Subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection:
1. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (g) of this subsection, the second trust may be a
nongrantor trust, even if the first trust is a grantor trust; and
2. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (j) of this subsection, the second trust may be a
grantor trust, even if the first trust is a nongrantor trust; and
(j) An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power if a settlor objects in a signed record
delivered to the fiduciary within the notice period and:
1. The first trust and a second trust are both grantor trusts, in whole or in part, the first trust
grants the settlor or another person the power to cause the first trust to cease to be a grantor
trust, and the second trust does not grant an equivalent power to the settlor or other person; or
2. The first trust is a nongrantor trust and a second trust is a grantor trust, in whole or in part,
with respect to the settlor, unless:
a. The settlor has the power at all times to cause the second trust to cease to be a grantor
trust; or
b. The first-trust instrument contains a provision granting the settlor or another person a
power that would cause the first trust to cease to be a grantor trust and the second-trust
instrument contains the same provision.
SECTION 105. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a second trust may have a duration that is the same as or different
from the duration of the first trust.
(2) To the extent that property of a second trust is attributable to property of the first trust, the property of the
second trust is subject to any rules governing maximum perpetuity, accumulation, or suspension of the
power of alienation which apply to the property of the first trust.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

46 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SECTION 106. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power whether or not under the first trust's discretionary
distribution standard the fiduciary would have made or could have been compelled to make a discretionary
distribution of principal at the time of the exercise.
SECTION 107. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If exercise of the decanting power would be effective under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act except that the
second-trust instrument in part does not comply with the provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act, the
exercise of the power is effective and the following rules shall apply with respect to the principal of the
second trust attributable to the exercise of the power:
(a) A provision in the second-trust instrument which is not permitted under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act
is void to the extent necessary to comply with Sections 87 to 114 of this Act; and
(b) A provision required by Sections 87 to 114 of this Act to be in the second-trust instrument which is
not contained in the instrument is deemed to be included in the instrument to the extent necessary to
comply with Sections 87 to 114 of this Act.
(2) If a trustee or other fiduciary of a second trust determines that subsection (1) of this section applies to a
prior exercise of the decanting power, the fiduciary shall take corrective action consistent with the
fiduciary's duties.
SECTION 108. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Animal trust" means a trust or an interest in a trust created to provide for the care of one (1) or
more animals; and
(b) "Protector" means a person appointed in an animal trust to enforce the trust on behalf of the animal
or, if no such person is appointed in the trust, a person appointed by the court for that purpose.
(2) The decanting power may be exercised over an animal trust that has a protector to the extent the trust could
be decanted under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act if each animal that benefits from the trust were an
individual, if the protector consents in a signed record to the exercise of the power.
(3) A protector for an animal has the rights under Sections 87 to 114 of this Act of a qualified beneficiary.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act, if a first trust is an animal trust, in an
exercise of the decanting power, the second trust shall provide that trust property may be applied only to its
intended purpose for the period the first trust benefitted the animal.
SECTION 109. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A reference in KRS Chapter 386B to a trust instrument or terms of the trust includes a second-trust instrument
and the terms of the second trust.
SECTION 110. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of law of this Commonwealth other than Sections 87 to 114 of this Act and subject to
subsection (2) of this section, a settlor of a first trust is deemed to be the settlor of the second trust with
respect to the portion of the principal of the first trust subject to the exercise of the decanting power.
(2) In determining settlor intent with respect to a second trust, the intent of a settlor of the first trust, a settlor of
the second trust, and the authorized fiduciary may be considered.
SECTION 111. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if exercise of the decanting power was
intended to distribute all the principal of the first trust to one (1) or more second trusts, later-discovered

CHAPTER 134 47
property belonging to the first trust and property paid to or acquired by the first trust after the exercise of
the power is part of the trust estate of the second trust or trusts.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if exercise of the decanting power was
intended to distribute less than all the principal of the first trust to one (1) or more second trusts, later-
discovered property belonging to the first trust or property paid to or acquired by the first trust after exercise
of the power remains part of the trust estate of the first trust.
(3) An authorized fiduciary may provide in an exercise of the decanting power or by the terms of a second trust
for disposition of later-discovered property belonging to the first trust or property paid to or acquired by the
first trust after exercise of the power.
SECTION 112. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A debt, liability, or other obligation enforceable against property of a first trust is enforceable to the same extent
against the property when held by the second trust after exercise of the decanting power.
SECTION 113. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 87 to 114 of this Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote
uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
SECTION 114. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 386B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The provisions of Sections 87 to 114 of this Act modify, limit, or supersede the Electronic Signatures in Global and
National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., but do not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that
Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of
that Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003(b).
Section 115. KRS 386.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 386.010 to 386.170[386.175], unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Fiduciary" means any trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, conservator or other individual or
corporation holding funds or otherwise acting in a fiduciary capacity.
(2) "Principal" means any person to whom a fiduciary, as such, owes an obligation.
Section 116. KRS 386B.1-010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Action" with respect to an act of a trustee, includes a failure to act;
(2) "Ascertainable standard" means a standard relating to an individual's health, education, support, or
maintenance within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. sec. 2041(b)(1)(A) or 26 U.S.C. sec. 2514(c)(1), as amended;
(3) "Beneficiary" means a person that:
(a) Has a present or future beneficial interest in a trust, vested or contingent; or
(b) In a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a power of appointment over trust property;
(4) "Charitable trust" means a trust, or part of a trust, established for a charitable purpose as described in KRS
386B.4-050(1);
(5) "Conservator" means a person appointed by the court to administer the estate of a minor or adult individual;
(6) "Environmental law" means a federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of
the environment;
(7) "Guardian" means a person appointed by the court, a parent, or a spouse to make decisions regarding the
support, care, education, health, and welfare of a minor or adult individual. The term shall not include a
guardian ad litem;
(8) "Interests of the beneficiaries" means the beneficial interests provided in the terms of the trust;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

48 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(9) "Jurisdiction," with respect to a geographic area, includes a state or country;
(10) "Person" means any individual or entity as defined in KRS 446.010;
(11) "Power of direction":
(a) Means a power over a trust granted to a person by the terms of the trust to the extent the power is
exercisable while the person is not serving as a trustee;
(b) Includes a power over the investment, management, or distribution of trust property or other matters
of trust administration; and
(c) Excludes the powers described in subsection (2) of Section 73 of this Act;
(12)[(11)] "Power of withdrawal" means a presently exercisable general power of appointment other than a power:
(a) Exercisable by a trustee and limited by an ascertainable standard; or
(b) Exercisable by another person only on the consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest;
(13)[(12)] "Property" means anything that may be the subject of ownership, whether legal or equitable, or any
interest therein;
(14)[(13)] "Qualified beneficiary" means a beneficiary who, on the date the beneficiary's qualification is
determined:
(a) Is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;
(b) Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the interests of the
distributees described in paragraph (a) of this subsection ended on that date without causing the trust to
end; or
(c) Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust ended on that
date;
(15)[(14)] "Revocable," as applied to a trust, means revocable by the settlor without the consent of the trustee or a
person holding an adverse interest;
(16)[(15)] "Settlor" means a person, including a testator, who creates or contributes property to a trust. If more
than one (1) person creates or contributes property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the part of the trust
property attributable to that person's contribution except to the extent another person has the power to revoke
or withdraw that part;
(17)[(16)] "Spendthrift provision" means a term of a trust which restrains both voluntary and involuntary transfer
of a beneficiary's interest;
(18)[(17)] "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States
Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term
includes an Indian tribe or band recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state;
(19)[(18)] "Terms of a trust" means:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the manifestation of the settlor's
intent regarding a trust's provisions as:
1. Expressed in the trust instrument; or[ as may be ]
2. Established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial proceeding; or
(b) The trust's provisions as established, determined, or amended by:
1. A trustee or trust director in accordance with applicable law;
2. A court order; or
3. A nonjudicial settlement agreement under KRS 386B.1-090;
(20)[(19)] (a) "Trust" means an express trust established by a trust instrument, including a will, whereby a
trustee has the duty to administer a trust asset for the benefit of a named or otherwise described income
or principal beneficiary, or both. This definition includes oral trusts.

CHAPTER 134 49
(b) "Trust" does not include a resulting or constructive trust, a business trust which provides for certificates
to be issued to the beneficiary, an investment trust, a voting trust, a security instrument, a trust
established by the judgment of a court, a liquidation trust, or a trust for the primary purpose of paying
dividends, interests, interest coupons, salaries, wages, pensions or profits, or employee benefits of any
kind, an instrument in which a person is nominee or escrowee for another, a trust established in deposits
in any financial institution, or other trust the nature of which does not admit of general trust
administration;
(21) "Trust director" means a person that is granted power of direction by the terms of a trust to the extent the
power is exercisable while the person is not serving as a trustee. The person is a trust director whether or
not the terms of the trust refer to the person as a trust director and whether or not the person is a
beneficiary or settlor of the trust;
(22)[(20)] "Trust instrument" means an instrument signed by the settlor that contains terms of the trust, including
any amendments thereto; and
(23)[(21)] "Trustee" includes an original, additional, and successor trustee, and a cotrustee.
Section 117. KRS 386B.1-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, this chapter governs the duties and powers of a trustee,
relations among trustees, and the rights and interests of a beneficiary.
(2) The terms of a trust prevail over any provision of this chapter, except:
(a) The requirements for creating a trust;
(b) Subject to Sections 77, 79, and 80 of this Act, the duty of a trustee to act in good faith and in the
interests of the beneficiaries;
(c) The requirement that a trust and its terms be for the benefit of its beneficiaries, and that the trust have a
purpose that is lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve;
(d) The power of the court to change or terminate a trust under Subchapter 4 of this chapter;
(e) The effect of a spendthrift provision and the rights of certain creditors and assignees to reach a trust as
provided in Subchapter 5 of this chapter;
(f) The power of the court under KRS 386B.7-020 to require, dispense with, or modify or terminate a
bond;
(g) The power of the court under KRS 386B.7-080(2) to adjust a trustee's compensation as specified in the
terms of the trust which is unreasonably low or high;
(h) The duty to notify and report under KRS 386B.8-130(2);
(i) The effect of an exculpatory term under KRS 386B.10-080;
(j) The rights under KRS 386B.10-100, 386B.10-110, and 386B.10-120 of a person other than a trustee or
beneficiary;
(k) Periods of limitation for commencing a judicial proceeding;
(l) The power of the court to take such action and exercise such jurisdiction as may be necessary in the
interests of justice; and
(m) The subject-matter jurisdiction of the court and venue for commencing a proceeding as provided in
KRS 386B.2-030 and 386B.2-040.
Section 118. KRS 386B.1-060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Without precluding other means for establishing a connection with the designated jurisdiction, terms of a trust
designating the principal place of administration are valid and controlling if:
(a) A trustee's principal place of business is located in or a trustee is a resident of the designated
jurisdiction;[ or]
(b) A trust director's principal place of business is located in or a trust director is a resident of the
designated jurisdiction; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

50 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c)[(b)] All or part of the administration occurs in the designated jurisdiction.
(2) A trustee is under a continuing duty to administer the trust at a place appropriate to its purposes, its
administration, and the interests of the beneficiaries.
(3) Without precluding the right of the court to order, approve, or disapprove a transfer, the trustee, in furtherance
of the duty prescribed by subsection (2) of this section, may transfer the trust's principal place of
administration to another state or to a jurisdiction outside of the United States.
(4) The trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of a proposed transfer of a trust's principal place of
administration not less than sixty (60) days before initiating the transfer. The notice of proposed transfer shall
include:
(a) The name of the jurisdiction to which the principal place of administration is to be transferred;
(b) The address and telephone number at the new location at which the trustee can be contacted;
(c) An explanation of the reasons for the proposed transfer;
(d) The date on which the proposed transfer is anticipated to occur; and
(e) The date, not less than sixty (60) days after the giving of the notice, by which the qualified beneficiary
shall notify the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer.
(5) The authority of a trustee under this section to transfer a trust's principal place of administration ends if a
qualified beneficiary notifies the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer on or before the date specified
in the notice.
(6) In connection with a transfer of the trust's principal place of administration, the trustee may transfer some or
all of the trust property to a successor trustee designated in the terms of the trust or appointed under KRS
386B.7-040.
(7) The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.
Section 119. KRS 386B.3-010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this subchapter has the same effect as if
notice were given directly to the other person.
(2) The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this subchapter is binding on the
person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent would
otherwise have become effective.
(3) Except as otherwise provided under KRS 386B.4-110 and 386B.6-020, a person who under this subchapter
may represent a settlor who lacks capacity, may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor's
behalf.
(4) A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this subchapter with respect to the termination or
modification of a trust under KRS 386B.4-110(1).
(5) Provisions of this subchapter shall also be applicable to Sections 87 to 114 of this Act[KRS 386.175]
regarding a trustee's power to appoint principal and income in favor of a trustee of a second trust and KRS
386.454 regarding a trustee's power to adjust between principal and income and conversion to unitrust.
Section 120. KRS 386B.6-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) While a trust is revocable:
(a) And, in the reasonable belief of the trustee, the settlor has capacity to revoke the trust, rights of the
beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the
settlor; and
(b) The trustee may follow a direction of the settlor that is contrary to the terms of the trust.
(2) During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal has the rights of a settlor
of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the property subject to the power.
Section 121. KRS 386B.7-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Cotrustees who are unable to reach a unanimous decision may act by majority decision.

CHAPTER 134 51
(2) If a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship, the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.
(3) Subject to Section 80 of this Act, a cotrustee shall participate in the performance of a trustee's function unless
the cotrustee is unavailable to perform the function because of absence, illness, disqualification under other
law, or other temporary incapacity or the cotrustee has properly delegated the performance of the function to
another trustee.
(4) If a cotrustee is unavailable to perform duties because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or
other temporary incapacity, and prompt action is necessary to achieve the purposes of the trust or to avoid
injury to the trust property, the remaining cotrustee or a majority of the remaining cotrustees may act for the
trust.
(5) A trustee may not delegate to a cotrustee the performance of a function the settlor reasonably expected the
trustees to perform jointly. Unless a delegation was irrevocable, a trustee may revoke a delegation previously
made.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, a trustee who does not join in an action of
another trustee is not liable for the action.
(7) Subject to Section 80 of this Act, each trustee shall exercise reasonable care to:
(a) Prevent a cotrustee from committing a breach of trust; and
(b) Compel a cotrustee to redress a breach of trust.
(8) A dissenting trustee who joins in an action at the direction of the majority of the trustees and who notified any
cotrustee of the dissent at or before the time of the action is not liable for the action unless the action is a
breach of trust.
Section 122. KRS 386B.8-180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) When a trust terminates pursuant to the terms of the trust, the trustee may follow the requirements for
distribution upon termination as provided in KRS 386B.8-170 or, if proceeding under this section,
within a reasonable amount of time after such termination, the trustee shall provide to the qualified
beneficiaries a statement showing the fair market value of the net assets to be distributed, a trust
accounting for the prior five (5) years and an estimate for any items reasonably anticipated but not yet
received or disbursed, the amount of any fees, including trustee fees, remaining to be paid, and notice
that the trust is terminating. The trustee may also provide such statement and notice to any other person
whom the trustee reasonably believes may have an interest in the trust.
(b) If, after receiving the notice and trust information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a
qualified beneficiary objects to an action or omission disclosed, he or she shall provide written notice of
the objection to the trustee within forty-five (45) days of the notice having been sent by the trustee. If
no written objection is provided within the forty-five (45) day time period, the information provided
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be considered approved by the recipient and the
trustee shall, within a reasonable period of time following the expiration of such period, distribute the
assets as provided in the trust. If the trustee receives a written objection within the applicable forty-five
(45) day time period, the trustee may:
1. Submit the written objection to the District Court for resolution and charge the expense of
commencing such a proceeding to the trust; or
2. Resolve the objection with the qualified beneficiary, whether by nonjudicial settlement
agreement or otherwise. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this paragraph may include a
release, an indemnity clause, or both on the part of the beneficiary against the trustee relating to
the trust. If the parties agree to a nonjudicial settlement agreement, any related expenses shall be
charged to the trust.
Upon a resolution of an objection pursuant to subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph, within a
reasonable period of time thereafter the trustee shall distribute the remaining trust assets as provided in
the trust.
(c) The trustee may rely upon the written statement of a person receiving notice that such person does not
object.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

52 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) (a) When a trustee is removed or resigns pursuant to the terms of the trust, the trustee may follow the
requirements for distribution upon termination as provided in KRS 386B.8-170 or, if proceeding under
this section, the trustee, within a reasonable time after such removal or resignation, shall provide to the
successor trustee a statement showing the net assets to be distributed, a trust accounting for the prior
five (5) years, an estimate for any items reasonably anticipated but not yet received or disbursed, the
amount of any fees, including trustee fees, remaining to be paid, and notice that the trustee has resigned
or been removed. The trustee may also provide such statement and notice to any other person whom
trustee reasonably believes may have an interest in the trust.
(b) Any person provided notice and trust information as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection who
objects to an action or omission disclosed shall provide written notice of the objection to the trustee
within forty-five (45) days of the notice having been sent by the trustee. If no written objection is
provided within the forty-five (45) day time period, the information provided pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subsection will be considered approved, and the trustee shall, within a reasonable period
following the expiration of such forty-five (45) day period, distribute the assets to the successor trustee.
If the trustee receives a written objection within the applicable forty-five (45) day time period, the
trustee may:
1. Submit the written objection to the District Court for resolution and charge the expense of
commencing such a proceeding to the trust; or
2. Resolve the objection with the opposing party, whether by nonjudicial settlement agreement or
otherwise. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this paragraph may include a release, an
indemnity clause, or both on the part of the opposing party against the trustee relating to the trust.
If the parties agree to a nonjudicial settlement agreement, any related expenses shall be charged
to the trust.
Upon a resolution of any objection raised by an opposing party pursuant to subparagraph 1. or 2. of this
paragraph, within a reasonable period of time thereafter the trustee shall distribute the remaining trust
assets as provided in the trust.
(c) The trustee may rely upon the written statement of a person receiving notice that such person does not
object.
(3) When a trustee distributes assets of the trust pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the limitations in
KRS 386B.6-040 and 386B.10-050 are waived by each person who received notice and either consented or
failed to object pursuant to this section, and any such person is barred from bringing a claim against the trustee
for breach of trust or challenging the validity of the trust, to the same extent and with the same preclusive
effect as if the court had entered a final order approving the trustee's final account.
(4) Notice provided under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall clearly warn of the impending bar of claims
against a trustee under KRS 386B.6-040 and 386B.10-050 that will result if an objection is not timely made.
(5) No trustee trust shall request that any beneficiary indemnify the trustee against loss in exchange for the trustee
forgoing a request to the court to approve its accounts at the time the trust terminates or at the time the trustee
is removed or resigns, except as agreed upon by the parties pursuant to paragraph (b)1. or 2. of subsections (1)
and (2) of this section.
(6) For purposes of this section, a termination of a trust under Subchapter 4 of KRS Chapter 386B shall be
considered a termination pursuant to the trust terms.
(7) The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.
Section 123. KRS 394.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, "will":
(1) Means a last will or testament, codicil, appointment by will, writing in the nature of a will in exercise of a
power, and any other testamentary disposition; and
(2) Includes a codicil and any testamentary instrument that merely appoints an executor, revokes or revises
another will, nominates a guardian, or expressly excludes or limits the right of an individual or class to
succeed to property of the decedent passing by intestate succession.
SECTION 124. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:

CHAPTER 134 53
(a) "Beneficiary" means a person designated to receive title to a vehicle upon the death of the preceding
owner or joint owners;
(b) "Beneficiary designation form" means a form that contains the intention of a present owner or joint
owners of a vehicle to name one (1) beneficiary to receive title to the vehicle upon the death of the
owner or last surviving joint owner of the vehicle;
(c) "Joint owner":
1. Means an individual who owns a vehicle with one (1) or more other individuals as joint
tenants with rights of survivorship; and
2. Does not include an individual who owns a vehicle with one (1) or more other individuals as
tenants in common;
(d) "Owner" means an individual who owns a vehicle; and
(e) "Vehicle" includes any motor vehicle, motorcycle, motor home, trailer, or other item for which a
certificate of title is issued by the cabinet.
(2) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) Provide a beneficiary designation form that allows the owner or joint owners of a vehicle to provide
for the transfer of the vehicle's title to one (1) named beneficiary upon the death of the owner or
upon the death of all joint owners of the vehicle. The form shall include but not be limited to fields
for the following information:
1. The manufacturer, model, year, and vehicle identification number of the vehicle;
2. The name of the owner or every joint owner of the vehicle;
3. The words "transfer on death to," or the abbreviation "TOD," followed by the name of the
beneficiary; and
4. The signature of the owner of the vehicle or of each joint owner of the vehicle; and
(b) Require the county clerk to record the name of the beneficiary on the title upon receipt of the fee
under KRS 186A.130.
(3) The cabinet shall make beneficiary forms available:
(a) In each county clerk's office; and
(b) On the cabinet's public website.
(4) Upon the death of the owner, or the last surviving joint owner, of a vehicle for which a beneficiary has been
designated under subsection (2) of this section, the beneficiary shall present to the county clerk:
(a) A death certificate of the owner or last surviving joint owner of the vehicle;
(b) Proof of payment of ad valorem taxes on the vehicle for the current year, or if the taxes have not
been paid, the beneficiary may elect to pay the taxes to facilitate the transfer;
(c) The paper title, or duplicate title, if the title is not held in electronic format; and
(d) The fee required under KRS 186A.130 for the certificate of title transfer.
(5) Upon presentation of the documents as required under subsection (4) of this section, the county clerk,
subject to any security interest in the vehicle, shall issue a new certificate of title to the beneficiary.
(6) During the lifetime of the owner of the vehicle for which a beneficiary has been designated or before the
death of the last surviving joint owner of the vehicle:
(a) The signature or consent of the beneficiary shall not be required for any transaction relating to the
vehicle; and
(b) The owner or surviving joint owners of the vehicle may revoke or change the beneficiary designation
at any time by:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

54 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Selling the vehicle with proper transfer and delivery of the certificate of title to another
person; or
2. Properly executing a subsequent beneficiary designation form that removes the current
beneficiary or designates a new beneficiary in conformity with subsection (2) of this section.
(7) Upon the death of the owner or the last surviving joint owner of a vehicle for which a beneficiary has been
designated, the interest of the beneficiary in the vehicle shall be subject to any contract of sale, assignment,
or ownership or security interest to which the owner or joint owners of the vehicle were subject during their
lifetime.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (6)(b) of this section, the designation of a beneficiary shall not be changed
or revoked by will, codicil, or by other instrument.
(9) A beneficiary may disclaim the interest in the motor vehicle on a form promulgated by the Transportation
Cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(10) The transfer on death of a vehicle under this section shall be a nontestamentary transfer and shall not be
subject to any tax under KRS 138.460.
Section 125. KRS 138.470 is amended to read as follows:
There is expressly exempted from the tax imposed by KRS 138.460:
(1) (a) Motor vehicles titled or registered to the United States, or to the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of
its political subdivisions; and
(b) The gross rental or lease charges for the rental or lease of a motor vehicle paid by the United States, or
the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of its political subdivisions;
(2) Motor vehicles titled or registered to institutions of purely public charity and institutions of education not used
or employed for gain by any person or corporation;
(3) Motor vehicles which have been previously titled in Kentucky on or after July 1, 2005, or previously
registered and titled in any state or by the federal government when being sold or transferred to licensed motor
vehicle dealers for resale. The motor vehicles shall not be leased, rented, or loaned to any person and shall be
held for resale only;
(4) Motor vehicles sold by or transferred from dealers registered and licensed in compliance with the provisions of
KRS 186.070 and KRS 190.010 to 190.080 to members of the Armed Forces on duty in this Commonwealth
under orders from the United States government;
(5) Commercial motor vehicles, excluding passenger vehicles having a seating capacity for nine (9) persons or
less, owned by nonresident owners and used primarily in interstate commerce and based in a state other than
Kentucky which are required to be registered in Kentucky by reason of operational requirements or fleet
proration agreements and are registered pursuant to KRS 186.145;
(6) Motor vehicles titled in Kentucky on or after July 1, 2005, or previously registered in Kentucky, transferred
between husband and wife, parent and child, stepparent and stepchild, or grandparent and grandchild;
(7) Motor vehicles transferred when a business changes its name and no other transaction has taken place or an
individual changes his or her name;
(8) Motor vehicles transferred to a corporation from a proprietorship or limited liability company, to a limited
liability company from a corporation or proprietorship, or from a corporation or limited liability company to a
proprietorship, within six (6) months from the time that the business is incorporated, organized, or dissolved, if
the transferor and the transferee are the same business entity except for a change in legal form;
(9) Motor vehicles transferred by will, court order, or under the statutes covering descent and distribution of
property, if the vehicles were titled in Kentucky on or after July 1, 2005, or previously registered in Kentucky;
(10) Motor vehicles transferred between a subsidiary corporation and its parent corporation if there is no
consideration, or nominal consideration, or in sole consideration of the cancellation or surrender of stock;
(11) Motor vehicles transferred between a limited liability company and any of its members, if there is no
consideration, or nominal consideration, or in sole consideration of the cancellation or surrender of stock;
(12) The interest of a partner in a motor vehicle when other interests are transferred to him or her;

CHAPTER 134 55
(13) Motor vehicles repossessed by a secured party who has a security interest in effect at the time of repossession
and a repossession affidavit as required by KRS 186.045(6). The repossessor shall hold the vehicle for resale
only and not for personal use, unless he or she has previously paid the motor vehicle usage tax on the vehicle;
(14) Motor vehicles transferred to an insurance company to settle a claim. These vehicles shall be junked or held
for resale only;
(15) Motor carriers operating under a charter bus certificate issued by the Transportation Cabinet under KRS
Chapter 281;
(16) (a) 1. Motor vehicles registered under KRS 186.050 that have a declared gross vehicle weight with any
towed unit of forty-four thousand and one (44,001) pounds or greater; and
2. Farm trucks registered under KRS 186.050(4) that have a declared gross vehicle weight with any
towed unit of forty-four thousand and one (44,001) pounds or greater.
(b) To be eligible for the exemption established in paragraph (a) of this subsection, motor vehicles shall be
registered at the appropriate range for the declared gross weight of the vehicle established in KRS
186.050(3)(b) and shall be prohibited from registering at a higher weight range. If a motor vehicle is
initially registered in one (1) declared gross weight range and subsequently is registered at a declared
gross weight range lower than forty-four thousand and one (44,001) pounds, the person registering the
vehicle shall be required to pay the county clerk the usage tax due on the vehicle unless the person can
provide written proof to the clerk that the tax has been previously paid;
(17) Motor vehicles transferred to a trustee to be held in trust, or from a trustee to a beneficiary of the trust, if a
direct transfer from the grantor of the trust to all individual beneficiaries of the trust would have qualified for
an exemption from the tax pursuant to subsection (6) or (9) of this section;
(18) Motor vehicles transferred to a trustee to be held in trust, if the grantor of the trust is a natural person and is
treated as the owner of any portion of the trust for federal income tax purposes under the provisions of 26
U.S.C. secs. 671 to 679;
(19) Motor vehicles transferred from a trustee of a trust to another person if:
(a) The grantor of the trust is a natural person and is treated as the owner of any portion of the trust for
federal income tax purposes under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. secs. 671 to 679; and
(b) A direct transfer from the grantor of the trust to the person would have qualified for an exemption from
the tax pursuant to subsection (6) or (9) of this section;[ and]
(20) Motor vehicles under a manufacturer's statement of origin in possession of a licensed new motor vehicle dealer
that are titled and transferred to a licensed used motor vehicle dealer and held for sale; and
(21) Motor vehicles transferred under Section 124 of this Act.
Section 126. KRS 395.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a personal representative moves out of the state and fails to designate a process agent as required by KRS
395.015[(1)], becomes insane or otherwise incapable to discharge the trust, goes bankrupt or insolvent or is in
failing circumstances, the District Court shall remove him or her, and the other personal representative, if
there is another, shall discharge the trust. If he or she resides in the county of his or her appointment or in an
adjoining county, and is not insane, he or she shall have ten (10) days' notice before the order of removal is
made. If he or she is insane, the notice shall be given to his or her committee, if he or her has one, and if there
is no committee, the court may appoint one.
(2) The district court may remove a personal representative for failing to give additional security when required
under KRS 62.060 and appoint another.
(3) The court shall require a personal representative who is removed to settle his accounts, and deliver over the
decedent's estate to the person appointed in his stead.
Section 127. KRS 395.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All fiduciaries required to execute a bond shall deliver to the clerk of the court of the county in which he or
she is appointed a bond payable to and with the Commonwealth, subscribed to by the principal and sureties
in the presence of a notary, in the amount as may be approved by the court in the order of appointment.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

56 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) The District Court shall not accept as surety, in any bond of a personal representative, any master or other
commissioner whose duty is to settle the accounts of personal representatives, or any judge or clerk of a
District Court or practicing attorney of that court.
(3)[(2)] The bond shall be filed[subscribed by the principal and sureties, approved by the court, attested by the
clerk of the court and carefully kept] by the clerk in his or her office in a record maintained[book to be
provided] for that purpose.
Section 128. KRS 45A.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall serve as the central procurement and contracting agency of the
Commonwealth. The cabinet shall:
(a) [The cabinet shall ]Require all agencies to furnish an estimate of specific needs for supplies, materials,
and equipment to be purchased by competitive bidding for the purpose of permitting scheduling of
purchasing in large volume. The cabinet shall establish and enforce schedules for purchasing supplies,
materials, and equipment. In addition, prior to the beginning of each fiscal year all agencies shall submit
to the Finance and Administration Cabinet an estimate of all needs for supplies, materials, and
equipment during that year which will have to be required through competitive bidding;[.]
(b) [The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall ]Have the authority[power], with the approval of the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, to transfer between departments, to salvage, to
exchange, and to condemn supplies, equipment, and real property; and[.]
(c) [The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall ]Attempt in every practicable way to ensure that state
agencies are fulfilling their business needs through the application of the best value criteria.
(2) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall recommend regulations, rules, and procedures and shall have
supervision over all purchases by the various spending agencies, except as otherwise provided by law, and,
subject to the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, shall promulgate
administrative regulations to govern purchasing by or for all these agencies. The cabinet shall publish a
manual of procedures which shall be incorporated by reference as an administrative regulation in accordance
with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A. This manual shall be distributed to agencies and shall be revised upon
issuance of amendments to these procedures. No purchase or contract shall be binding on the state or any
agency thereof unless approved by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or made under general
administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.
(3) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall purchase or otherwise acquire, or, with the approval of the
secretary, may delegate and control the purchase and acquisition of the combined requirements of all spending
agencies of the state, including, but not limited to, interests in real property, contractual services, rentals of all
types, supplies, materials, equipment, and services.
(4) (a) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of any interest in real
property of the state which is not needed, or has become unsuitable for public use, or would be more
suitable to the public's interest if used in another manner, as determined by the secretary of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet.
(b) The determination of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be set forth in an
order and shall be reached only after review of a written request by the agency desiring to dispose of the
real property. This request shall describe the real property and state the reasons why the agency
believes the real property should be disposed.
(c) Before the disposal of real property, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall
determine that:
1. No other state agency has a purpose for the real property; and
2. The city, county, urban-county government, or consolidated local government where the real
property is located does not have an ownership interest in the real property.
(d) All instruments required by law to be recorded which convey any interest in any real property so
disposed of shall be executed and signed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
and approved by the Governor.
(e) Unless the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet deems it in the best interest of the state
to proceed otherwise, all interests in real property shall be sold either by invitation of sealed bids or by

CHAPTER 134 57
public auction. The selling price of any interest in real property shall not be less than the appraised
value thereof as determined by the cabinet, or the Transportation Cabinet for the requirements of that
cabinet.
(f) A state agency notifying the Finance and Administration Cabinet of its intent to dispose of any
interest in real property assigned to the state agency shall continue to provide maintenance and
security of the existing structures, buildings, and land included in the real property until the sale or
other disposition is complete.
(g) In the event the Finance and Administration Cabinet receives no responsive bids for real property
being disposed of, either by sealed bid or by public auction, the real property may be disposed of,
consistent with the public interest, in any manner deemed appropriate by the secretary of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet. A written description of the real property, the method of disposal, and
the amount of compensation, if any, shall be made by the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet.
(5) (a) If state-owned real property is observed to be abandoned, or it has not been substantially utilized for
a public use, the chief executive officer of the city, county, urban-county government, or consolidated
local government where the real property is located may:
1. Receive notice inquiring about the real property from a citizen, developer, or consultant as
described in paragraph (d) of this subsection;
2. Develop a plan for public use of the real property; and
3. Submit a written notice to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the
Capital Planning Advisory Board:
a. Expressing interest in the use of the real property;
b. Requesting state utilization information from the Finance and Administration Cabinet
on the availability of the real property for disposal; and
c. Requesting the real property to be considered for sale, trade, or disposal.
(b) Within sixty (60) calendar days of receiving written notice under paragraph (a)3. of this subsection,
the secretary of Finance and Administration Cabinet shall send a written response to the chief
executive officer of the city, county, urban-county government, or consolidated local government and
the Capital Planning Advisory Board that includes but is not limited to:
1. The current occupancy and use of the real property;
2. If the Finance and Administration Cabinet or other applicable state agency intends to evaluate
real property for disposal under subsection (4) of this section or to maintain its ownership
interest in the real property for public use; and
3. Provide a description of the real property, current status, available and planned occupancy,
utilization, restrictions of use, and a timeline for full utilization of the property.
(c) If the applicable state agency determines to request disposal of the real property, the state agency and
Finance and Administration Cabinet shall proceed in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
(d) A citizen, developer, or consultant may notify the chief executive officer of the city, county, urban-
county government, or consolidated local government where state-owned real property is located if
he or she observes that the state-owned real property is abandoned or not substantially utilized for
public use.
(6) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of all personal property of the
state that is not needed, or has become unsuitable for public use, or would be more suitable to the public's
interest if used in another manner, or, with the approval of the secretary, may delegate the sale, trade, or other
disposal of the personal property. In the event the authority is delegated, the method for disposal shall be
determined by the agency head, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, and shall be set forth in a document describing the property and stating the method of
disposal and the reasons why the agency believes the property should be disposed of. In the event the authority
is not delegated, requests to the Finance and Administration Cabinet to sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of the
property shall describe the property and state the reasons why the agency believes the property should be
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

58 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
disposed of. The method for disposal shall be determined by the Division of Surplus Properties, and approved
by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee.
(7)[(6)] The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall exercise general supervision and control over all
warehouses, storerooms, and stores and of all inventories of supplies, services, and construction belonging to
the Commonwealth. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to require agencies to take and
maintain inventories of plant property, buildings, structures, other fixed assets, and equipment. The cabinet
shall conduct periodic physical audits of inventories.
(8)[(7)] The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall establish and maintain programs for the development and
use of purchasing specifications and for the inspection, testing, and acceptance of supplies, services, and
construction.
(9)[(8)] Nothing in this section shall prevent the Finance and Administration Cabinet from negotiating with
vendors who maintain a General Services Administration price agreement with the United States of America
or any agency thereof. No contract executed under this provision shall authorize a price higher than is
contained in the contract between the General Services Administration and the vendor affected.
(10)[(9)] Except as provided in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180, and subject to the provisions of this code,
the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall purchase or otherwise acquire all real property determined to be
needed for state use, upon approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as to the
determination of need and as to the action of purchase or other acquisition. The amount paid for this real
property shall not exceed the appraised value as determined by the cabinet or the Transportation Cabinet (for
such requirements of that cabinet), or the value set by eminent domain procedure. Subject to the provisions of
this code, real property or any interest therein may be purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired from any
officer or employee of any agency of the state upon a finding by the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
based upon a written application by the head of the agency requesting the purchase, and approved by the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Governor, that the employee has not either
himself or herself, or through any other person, influenced or attempted to influence either the agency
requesting the acquisition of the property or the Finance and Administration Cabinet in connection with such
acquisition. Whenever such an acquisition is consummated, the request and finding shall be recorded and kept
by the Secretary of State along with the other documents recorded pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter
56.
(11)[(10)] The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain records of all purchases and sales made under
its authority and shall make periodic summary reports of all transactions to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, the Governor, and the General Assembly. The Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall also report trends in costs and prices, including savings realized through improved practices, to the above
authorities. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall also compile an annual report of state purchases by
all spending agencies in the state's statewide accounting and reporting system. The report format shall include,
but not be limited to, dollar amount, volume, type of purchase, and vendor.
(12)[(11)] For capital construction projects, subject to the provisions of this code and KRS 45A.180, the
procurement may be on whichever of the following alternative project delivery methods, in the judgment of
the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet after first considering the traditional design-bid-build
project delivery method, offers the best value to the taxpayer:
(a) A design-build basis; or
(b) A construction management-at-risk basis.
Proposals shall be reviewed by the engineering staff to assure quality and value, and compliance with
procurement procedures. All specifications shall be written to promote competition. Nothing in this section
shall prohibit the procurement of phased bidding or construction manager-agency services.
(13)[(12)] The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have control and supervision over all purchases of
energy-consuming equipment, supplies, and related equipment purchased or acquired by any agency of the
state as provided in this code, and shall promulgate administrative regulations to designate the manner in
which an energy-consuming item will be purchased so as to promote energy conservation and acquisition of
energy efficient products. Major energy components shall be amortized on a seven (7) to ten (10) years'
recovery basis and shall take into consideration the projected cost of fuel. The Finance and Administration
Cabinet, in consultation with the Cabinet for Economic Development, shall conduct a thorough economic
feasibility analysis on any major energy-using component of at least three million (3,000,000) BTU's per hour
heat input and shall issue a certificate of economic feasibility prior to the Finance and Administration

CHAPTER 134 59
Cabinet's purchasing or retrofitting any such component that utilizes any fuel other than coal. The economic
feasibility analysis shall consist of life-cycle cost comparisons of a component that would utilize coal and
one(s) that would utilize any fuel other than coal. For the analysis, the Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall provide detailed estimates of equipment purchase price, installation cost, annual operation and
maintenance costs, and usage patterns of energy-using components.
Section 129. KRS 56.463 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet shall have the power and duty:
(1) To determine the comparative needs and demands of the various state agencies for acquiring real estate and for
building projects;
(2) To purchase or otherwise acquire all real property determined to be needed for state use and upon the approval
of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as to the determination of need and as to the action
of purchase or other acquisition, except as provided in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180. All such
acquisitions of real property or interests therein shall be made in accordance with KRS 45A.045;
(3) (a) To sell or otherwise dispose of all property, including any interest in real property, of the state that is
not needed or has become unsuitable for public use or would be more suitable consistent with the public
interest for some other use as determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
All such sales or other disposition shall be made in accordance with KRS 45A.045.[;]
(b) A state agency notifying the Finance and Administration Cabinet of its intent to dispose of any
interest in real property assigned to the state agency shall continue to provide maintenance and
security of the existing structures, buildings, and land included in the real property until the sale or
other disposition is complete in accordance with Section 1 of this Act.
(4) (a) To control the use of any real property owned or otherwise held by the Commonwealth, or any state
agency, and to determine for what periods of time and for what purposes any state agency may use the
same, including the agency for whose use it was initially acquired or improved, and to determine what
appropriate uses shall be made of such real property during periods that the cabinet finds the same is not
required for the purposes of any particular state agency. The cabinet shall allocate to the General
Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission all space within the New State Capitol Annex in
the basement and on the first, second, third, and fourth floors, excluding:
1. Mechanical areas, public entrances, vestibules, and restrooms; and
2. The following additional space, as allocated on January 1, 2023:
a. Areas in the basement occupied by the Kentucky State Police and Facilities Security;
b. Areas in the basement operated as the snack bar and cafeteria, as well as storage areas
related to the operation of the snack bar and cafeteria;
c. The area in the basement operated as a nurse's station;
d. The area in the basement used as an automated teller machine (ATM);
e. The office space in the basement occupied by the Secretary of State;
f. Utility spaces in the basement west wing and east wing northernmost hallways occupied
by janitorial, maintenance, and mechanical staff;
g. The loading dock in the rear of the annex basement, along with the office space
immediately adjacent to the loading dock on the back wall of the annex, provided that the
General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission shall be given access to and
use of the loading dock and the receiving areas adjacent to the loading dock; and
h. Office and studio space on the first floor currently occupied and used for broadcasting
purposes by Kentucky Educational Television.
All space assigned to the legislative branch and plans, uses, furnishings, and equipment therefor are
subject to the specific approval of the Legislative Research Commission;
(b) All additional space in the New State Capitol Annex, not specifically allocated for use by the General
Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission in paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall be
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

60 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
allocated for the use of the legislative branch, with occupancy by the legislative branch to be
determined by the Legislative Research Commission, upon a vote of a majority of the entire
membership of the Legislative Research Commission;
(c) In order for the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission to efficiently utilize the
space provided by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, the cabinet shall enter into a memorandum
of understanding with the Legislative Research Commission on or about February 1, 2024, and as often
as every two (2) years thereafter at the request of the Legislative Research Commission, to establish
tenancy terms, including but not limited to building maintenance, repairs, renovations, and upgrades;
facility security; janitorial services; and applicable rental and utilities rates. The Legislative Research
Commission shall at any time, and upon at least sixty (60) days' notice, be authorized to discontinue the
cabinet's provision of janitorial services for the New State Capitol Annex and to enter into a separate
contract for the provision of those services, with the applicable rental and utilities rates to be
proportionately reduced to reflect that separate contract, provided that the Legislative Research
Commission may also at any time, and upon at least sixty (60) days' notice, elect to have the cabinet
continue or reinstate the provision of those janitorial services at the cabinet's expense;
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, real property shall include the parking areas adjacent to the New
State Capitol and the New State Capitol Annex, and the cabinet shall allocate to the General Assembly
and the Legislative Research Commission all parking spaces within the Capitol campus parking garage,
all parking spaces in the east, south, and west parking lots of the New State Capitol Annex, and all
parking spaces in the west parking lot of the New State Capitol, except for those spaces in the west
parking lot of the New State Capitol allocated, as of January 1, 2023, to the Supreme Court of
Kentucky, the Lieutenant Governor, the Attorney General, and the Secretary of State. Any further
allocation of any parking spaces allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be within the sole discretion
of the Legislative Research Commission or its designee; and
(e) To determine the housing and furnishings needs of the various state agencies located in Frankfort and to
establish and put into effect a permanent program for housing them. Subject to paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection, the cabinet is also authorized and directed to allocate office space and furnishings in
existing public buildings located in Frankfort, exclusive of the third and fourth floors of the New State
Capitol and the space in the New State Capitol Annex allocated to the legislative branch, according to
the needs of the various agencies. When necessary, the cabinet is authorized to provide additional office
space and furnishings in Frankfort under any building program the cabinet deems most advisable and
economical for the state. The permanent housing program shall include provisions for housing the
General Assembly and its related agencies, including the Legislative Research Commission, and its
subcommittees, the executive offices, the Supreme Court and the clerk of the Supreme Court, the
Department of Law and the law library, in the New State Capitol, provided the General Assembly and
the Legislative Research Commission shall have complete control and exclusive use of the third and
fourth floors of the New State Capitol and shall have exclusive use of the space in the New State
Capitol Annex allocated to them under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. If there be any
additional space in the Capitol, it shall be assigned to agencies whose activities are most closely related
to the agencies directed to be located permanently in the Capitol;
(5) To acquire, by condemnation in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, any real estate
necessary for use by the state or by any state agency, when the cabinet is unable to agree with the owner
thereof on a price for such real estate;
(6) To lease any real property, or any interest in such real property, owned by the state or any agency thereof, in
accordance with KRS 45A.045;
(7) To provide for and adopt plans and specifications as may be necessary, to provide adequate public notice for
and receive bids for any expenditures proposed to be made, to award contracts for the purpose authorized, to
supervise construction and make changes and revisions in plans and specifications or in construction as may
become necessary, and generally to do any and all other things as may become necessary or expedient in order
to effectively fulfill and carry out the purposes of this chapter, including the right to employ clerks, engineers,
statisticians, architects, or other persons required to be employed in order to fulfill the functions of the
Commonwealth relating to state property and buildings provided in KRS 56.450 to 56.550; and
(8) To adopt rules and promulgate administrative regulations as may be necessary to govern the acquisition,
control, and disposition of the real property to which this section is applicable.
Section 130. KRS 27A.210 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 134 61
(1) The following books and records shall be maintained by the State Law Library:
(a) All copies of Volumes 1 to 77 of the Kentucky Reports;
(b) Twenty-five (25) copies each of Volumes 78 to 314 of the Kentucky Reports;
(c) Two (2) sets of all future publications of the journals and nine (9) sets of the Acts of the General
Assembly; and
(d) Two (2) sets of the official Kentucky statute publications.
(2) The state law librarian shall arrange with the proper official of each state of the United States and of the United
States and its territories for the exchanges of the statutes and the acts of the legislatures of each state and of
Congress. When an exchange is agreed upon, the state law librarian shall send to the officer one (1) copy of
the Acts of the General Assembly and one (1) set of statutes as soon as they are ready for distribution.
(3) Copies of acts, statutes, and other materials required to be kept by the state law librarian and to be made
available for exchange shall be furnished to the state law librarian, without charge, by the agency or official
responsible for the distribution of same.
(4) The state law librarian may arrange for the distribution or disposal of materials held by the State Law Library
upon concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations.
(5) The state law librarian may acquire, by purchase, exchange, donation, or otherwise, books and other materials
the librarian deems suitable for the holdings of the State Law Library.
(6) The state law librarian may, with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice
responsible for law library operations, sell any surplus books in the State Law Library that have a market
value, collect the funds received therefor, and deposit them in the ["]state law library surplus books fund,["]
which is hereby created in the State Treasury. The ["]state law library surplus books fund["] shall not lapse.
The state law librarian may reinvest the funds in other books and materials that the librarian deems suitable for
the holdings of the State Law Library. The provisions of KRS 45A.045(6)[(5)] concerning the powers and
duties of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not apply to sales made by the state law librarian under
this section.
(7) The state law librarian may, with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice
responsible for law library operations, offer and provide technical and other assistance to county law libraries
and to other publicly funded law libraries.
(8) The state law librarian may, upon the request of a county law library or other publicly funded law library and
with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations,
purchase books, supplies, or other materials for the library. The funds used for these purposes shall be those of
the county law library or other publicly funded law library.
(9) The state law librarian shall issue, with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice
responsible for law library operations, regulations for the operation, management, and lending policy of the
State Law Library.
Section 131. KRS 45A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 45A.800 to 45A.835 and KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180, all rights, powers,
duties, and authority relating to the procurement of supplies, services, and construction, and the management,
control, warehousing, sale, and disposal of supplies, services, and construction now vested in or exercised by
any state agency under the several statutes relating thereto, are hereby transferred to the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet as provided in this code, subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) Unless otherwise ordered by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the acquisition of the
following shall not be required through the Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Works of art for museum and public display;
(b) Published books, maps, periodicals, and technical pamphlets; and
(c) Services of visiting speakers, professors, and performing artists.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

62 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall include in all state agency price contracts for the purchase of
materials or supplies a provision that, as approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
any political subdivision, including cities of all classes, counties, school districts, or special districts, may
participate in these contracts to the same extent as the Commonwealth. Any political subdivision may purchase
materials and supplies in accordance with a contract for supplies and materials entered into by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet for the Commonwealth, including those contracts negotiated by the cabinet with
vendors who maintain a General Services Administration price agreement as provided in KRS
45A.045(9)[(8)]. Political subdivisions of the Commonwealth must comply with other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes which require purchase by competitive bidding, before participating in the contract,
unless the state contract has been let by competitive bidding, or the contract was negotiated as provided in
KRS 45A.045(9)[(8)].
(4) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall inform the Department for Local Government, which shall then
inform the appropriate purchasing agent of each political subdivision interested in participating under this
section, of all state agency contracts in effect between the Commonwealth and vendors.
(5) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary
for the implementation of this section and necessary to provide that the Commonwealth be reimbursed for any
additional expenses incurred by the Commonwealth in allowing political subdivisions to participate in
contracts with vendors.
(6) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall comply with all provisions relating to the methods of
purchasing in the Kentucky Revised Statutes. This section is not intended to repeal or otherwise affect any
provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes regarding purchasing methods of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet.
(7) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, all public agencies as defined in KRS 45A.490 shall comply
with the provisions for reciprocal preference for resident bidders in KRS 45A.490 to 45A.494.
Section 132. KRS 45A.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any public purchasing unit may either participate in, sponsor, conduct, or administer a cooperative purchasing
agreement for the acquisition of any supplies, services, or construction with any other public purchasing unit
or foreign purchasing activity, in accordance with an agreement entered into between the participants. This
cooperative purchasing may include[,] but is not limited to[,] joint contracts between public purchasing units
and access by local public purchasing units to open-ended state public purchasing unit contracts.
(2) Nothing in this code shall limit any public purchasing unit from selling to, acquiring from, or using any
property belonging to another public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity independent of the
requirements of KRS 45A.070 to 45A.180.
(3) Nothing in this code shall limit or restrict any public purchasing unit from entering into an agreement,
independent of the requirements of KRS 45A.045(6)[(5)] and KRS 45A.070 to 45A.165, with any other public
purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity for the cooperative use of supplies or services.
(4) Any public purchasing unit may enter into an agreement for the joint or common use of warehousing facilities
or the lease or common use of capital equipment or facilities with any other public purchasing unit or a foreign
purchasing activity subject to the terms as may be agreed upon between the parties.
(5) Nothing in this code shall limit or restrict the ability of local school districts to acquire supplies outside of the
public purchasing agreements when the supplies and equipment meeting the same specifications as the
contract items are available at a lower price elsewhere and the purchase does not exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500).
(6) Nothing in this code shall limit any public purchasing unit from receiving notice of or accepting a price
reduction on supplies or equipment when the supplies or equipment are being offered by the vendor with
whom a price agreement has been made; the supplies or equipment are being offered in accordance with all
terms and conditions that are specified in the price agreement, except those relating to price; and the price
reduction is offered to all of the participants in the price agreement. Public purchasing units may accept special
price reductions under this subsection even if the reduced price requires the purchase of a specified quantity of
units different from the quantity stated in the original price agreement. Price reductions under this subsection
shall not be considered to permanently alter the price of the supplies or equipment under the price agreement
with the Commonwealth, except where the price reductions are to be made permanent under the express terms

CHAPTER 134 63
of the price agreement and where the purchasing agency which solicited the price agreement determines that
the enforcement of those terms serves the best interest of the Commonwealth.
(7) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not exclude the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources
from, or interfere with the department's participation in, any contracts available to multiple state agencies for
the procurement of goods or services, including but not limited to interfering with the department's electronic
access to the statewide accounting system in any way.
Section 133. KRS 45A.810 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) One (1) or more architectural services selection committees and one (1) or more engineering or
engineering-related services selection committees shall be created in the Finance and Administration
Cabinet.
(b) One (1) or more engineering and engineering-related services selection committees shall be created in
the Transportation Cabinet.
(c) One (1) or more engineering and engineering-related services selection committees shall be created in
the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
(2) Except when an emergency condition exists as defined by KRS 45A.095(1)(a), when architectural,
engineering, or engineering-related services are procured under KRS 45A.837 and 45A.838, or when the
project is constructed under KRS 45A.045(12)[(11)](a) or (b):
(a) An architectural services selection committee created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall
participate in every instance of that cabinet's procuring architectural services for its own needs and the
needs of other agencies, and upon request from the commissioner of the Department of Fish and
Wildlife Resources, shall assist and participate in that department's procuring of architectural services;
(b) An engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall participate in every instance of that cabinet's procuring engineering or
engineering-related services;
(c) An engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Transportation
Cabinet shall participate in every instance of that cabinet's procuring engineering or engineering-related
services; and
(d) An engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Department of Fish
and Wildlife Resources shall participate in every instance of that department's procuring of engineering
or engineering-related services.
(3) An architectural services selection committee created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet to perform its
own procurement and assist other state agencies with procuring architectural services shall consist of six (6) or
more members selected in the manner specified within each paragraph:
(a) Two (2) architects. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall appoint a pool of at
least six (6) architects who are employees of the cabinet. At least three (3) of the architects shall be
merit employees of the cabinet. The secretary, or designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of
Public Accounts, or designee, shall randomly select architects from the pool. The first employee
selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a merit employee,
the second employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected
is a nonmerit employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit employee is selected. That
merit employee shall be placed on the selection committee;
(b) One (1) or more additional employees of the Department for Facilities Management, appointed by the
commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management, to serve as a nonvoting technical adviser
for a given project selection. Advisory members shall serve on a project-by-project basis and shall have
the requisite knowledge, training, or experience pertaining to the professional requirements of the
project;
(c) Two (2) merit employees of the user agency appointed by the head of that agency to serve for the
duration of the selection committee's participation in the project for which they were appointed by the
user agency;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

64 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) An individual. The Kentucky Society of Architects shall nominate nine (9) individuals, and the
Governor shall appoint three (3) of these individuals to serve in the pool from which the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, or designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public
Accounts, or designee, shall randomly select one (1) individual to serve on the committee;
(e) One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor, who
may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1)
employee is appointed, then that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1)
employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any committee proceeding; and
(f) Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the commissioner of the
Department of Facilities Management shall submit a statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts
attesting to full compliance with the selection process for each architectural firm appointed to provide
architectural services. In addition, a complete record of the selection process for each project shall be
maintained by the department and shall be subject to audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(4) The engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall consist of six (6) or more members selected in the manner specified in each
paragraph:
(a) Two (2) engineers. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall appoint a pool of at
least six (6) engineers who are employees of the cabinet. At least three (3) of the engineers shall be
merit employees of the cabinet. The secretary, or designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of
Public Accounts, or designee, shall randomly select engineers from the pool. The first employee
selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a merit employee,
the second employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected
is a nonmerit employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit employee is selected. That
merit employee shall be placed on the selection committee;
(b) Two (2) merit employees of the user agency appointed by the head of that agency to serve for the
duration of the selection committee's participation in the project for which they were appointed by the
user agency;
(c) An individual. The Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers and the Kentucky Consulting Engineers
Council shall together nominate nine (9) individuals, and the Governor shall appoint three (3) of these
individuals to serve in the pool from which the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or
designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or designee, shall randomly select
one (1) individual to serve on the committee;
(d) One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor, who
may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1)
employee is appointed, then that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1)
employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any committee proceeding;
(e) One (1) or more additional employees of the Department for Facilities Management to serve as
nonvoting technical adviser for a specific project selection. Advisory members shall serve on a project-
by-project basis and shall have the requisite knowledge, training, or experience pertaining to the
professional requirements of the project; and
(f) Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the commissioner of the
Department of Facilities Management shall submit a statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts
attesting to full compliance with the selection process for each firm appointed to provide engineering or
engineering-related services. In addition, a complete record of the selection process for each project
shall be maintained by the department and shall be subject to audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(5) The engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Transportation Cabinet
shall consist of six (6) or more members selected in the manner specified in each paragraph:
(a) Two (2) engineers. The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall appoint a pool of six (6) engineers
who are employees of the cabinet. At least three (3) of the engineers shall be merit employees of the
cabinet. The secretary, or designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or
designee, shall randomly select engineers from the pool. The first employee selected shall be placed on
the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a merit employee, the second employee
selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a nonmerit

CHAPTER 134 65
employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit employee is selected. That merit employee
shall be placed on the selection committee;
(b) Two (2) engineers who are merit employees of the user division appointed by the head of that division
to serve for the duration of the selection committee's participation in the project for which they were
appointed by the user agency. However, if two (2) user divisions have approximately equal
responsibilities or separate responsibilities for the project, each user division head shall appoint one (1)
member to the selection committee;
(c) An individual. The Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers and the Kentucky Consulting Engineers
Council shall together nominate nine (9) individuals, and the Governor shall appoint three (3) of these
individuals to serve in the pool from which the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, or designee,
under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or designee, shall randomly select one (1)
individual to serve on the committee;
(d) One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor, who
may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1)
employee is appointed, then that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1)
employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any committee proceeding; and
(e) Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the commissioner of the
Department of Highways shall submit a statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts attesting to full
compliance with the selection process for each firm appointed to provide engineering or engineering-
related services. In addition, a complete record of the selection process for each project shall be
maintained by the department and shall be subject to audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(6) The engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created within the Department of Fish
and Wildlife Resources shall consist of six (6) or more members selected as follows:
(a) The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall appoint five (5) members:
1. One (1) department employee in or designated to the job classification of Department of Fish and
Wildlife Resources Project Manager;
2. Two (2) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources employees in the Engineering and
Geological series, at least one (1) of whom shall be a merit employee;
3. One (1) merit employee of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources designated by the
division head for the project or by the commissioner; and
4. One (1) employee of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources who is an attorney;
(b) The Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers and the Kentucky Consulting Engineers Council shall
together nominate nine (9) individuals, and the Governor shall select three (3) of these individuals to
serve in a pool from which the commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, or
designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or designee, shall randomly select
one (1) individual to serve on the committee;
(c) One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor, who
may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1)
employee is appointed, then that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1)
employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any committee proceeding; and
(d) Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the commissioner of the
Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall submit a statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts
attesting to full compliance with the selection process for each firm appointed to provide engineering or
engineering-related services. A complete record of the selection process for each project shall be
maintained by the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources and shall be subject to audit by the
Auditor of Public Accounts.
(7) (a) All selection committee members shall have experience which qualifies them to serve on the
committee.
(b) The same appointment procedures set out in this section apply to any user agency or user division listed
in subsection (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section that does not operate under a merit system.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

66 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Any individual appointed to serve in a pool from which selection committee members are drawn shall
serve in the pool for an initial one (1) year term and may be reappointed. He or she shall serve until his
or her successor is appointed and qualified. A successor or a replacement, in the case of a vacancy in
the pool, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee. If a selection committee
member, drawn from a pool, leaves a selection committee, his or her replacement shall be drawn from
the pool in the same manner as he or she. The replacement shall have the merit or nonmerit status of his
or her predecessor.
(d) Any individual appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts to serve on selection committees shall
serve an initial one (1) year term and may be reappointed to succeed himself or herself. He or she shall
serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. A successor or a replacement, in the case of a
vacancy, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee.
(e) The selection committee members appointed by the head of a user agency or user division shall serve
on a project-by-project basis. These members shall participate only in committee action related to the
project for which they were appointed. A replacement, in the case of a vacancy, shall be appointed in
the same manner as the initial appointee.
Section 134. KRS 56.774 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Energy Efficiency Program for State Government Buildings shall provide for implementation of low
cost/no cost energy conservation measures, engineering analyses, energy efficiency measures, building
improvements, and monitoring of results for state-owned or state-leased buildings.
(2) Any engineering analysis conducted on a state-owned building shall assess the energy efficiency of the
building and make recommendations for improving the efficient use of energy within the building. The
analyses shall be performed by qualified engineers, architects, or other persons trained in energy efficiency
who may be employees of the cabinet or employed pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A, except that any engineers,
architects or other persons trained in energy efficiency and retained under a guaranteed energy savings
performance contract, shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS 45A.800 to 45A.835.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, measures to improve the energy efficiency of a state-
owned building, which have an aggregate simple payback period of five (5) years or less, shall be
implemented as general fund appropriations become available. No more than five percent (5%) of the cost of
energy conservation measures for a building may be utilized for monitoring the results.
(4) If general fund appropriations are available for energy conservation improvements, the cabinet shall prioritize
projects among the various state-owned buildings to determine which projects shall be implemented to best
utilize the available funding.
(5) If general fund appropriations are unavailable, energy conservation measures for a state-owned building may
be financed by other means. These other means include but are not limited to guaranteed energy savings
performance contracts as defined under KRS 56.770 entered into pursuant to KRS 45A.085 and KRS
45A.045(11)[(10)]. Guaranteed energy savings performance contracts shall not be subject to the provisions of
KRS 45A.800 to 45A.835. These energy conservation measures shall not be limited to those that have an
aggregate simple payback period of five (5) years or less, but shall result in reasonable economic benefit to the
Commonwealth. Ownership of the energy conservation measures shall be transferred to the Commonwealth
upon completion of the guaranteed energy savings performance contract or as otherwise agreed upon in the
contract. Savings from the implementation of the energy conservation measures under the guaranteed energy
savings performance contract shall be used to satisfy the obligations under the guaranteed energy savings
performance contract and to repay the cost of the other means used to finance the energy conservation
measures, and may be used to repay expenses incurred by the cabinet to reimburse the cabinet for expenses
related to the guaranteed energy savings performance contract, including but not limited to staff time for
monitoring, overseeing, and managing the project. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, remaining savings shall
remain in the state agency account and shall not lapse. All savings projected under a guaranteed energy
savings performance contract shall be guaranteed to the Commonwealth.
(6) The savings in reduced expenditures that are specified as payment sources shall be documented in the
guaranteed energy savings performance contract. Savings shall be determined by using one (1) of the
measurement and verification methodologies listed in the United States Department of Energy's "International
Performance Measurement and Verification Protocol." If specific data limitations or documented unique
characteristics of the project prevent use of the "International Performance Measurement and Verification

CHAPTER 134 67
Protocol," an alternative method that is compatible shall be adopted upon documentation and approval of the
secretary of the cabinet.
Section 135. KRS 56.782 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet shall report on or before October 15, 2008, and on or before every October 15 thereafter to the
Legislative Research Commission on progress made to maximize the use of energy-efficiency measures in state
government. The Legislative Research Commission shall transmit the report to the appropriate interim joint
committees and to the General Assembly when it convenes. The report shall include but not be limited to:
(1) A summary of initiatives undertaken by the cabinet during the reporting period to promote adoption of low
cost/no cost energy-efficiency measures, including employee training efforts;
(2) A summary of energy-efficiency measures installed and energy improvements made during the reporting
period;
(3) Energy consumption and expenditure data for facilities owned or leased by state government and any
documented savings made as a result of energy-efficiency measures and improvements;
(4) Status report on the number of buildings newly constructed, renovated, or leased in accordance with the high-
performance building standards required under KRS 56.777 and the amount of savings realized based upon a
life-cycle cost analysis;
(5) Any efforts made during the reporting period to promote acquisition of energy-efficient products pursuant to
KRS 45A.045(13)[(12)] and the amount of savings expected to be realized in the first year of operation from
the purchase of ENERGY STAR-qualified products pursuant to KRS 56.775;
(6) Any recommendations for future funding of energy improvements or other measures needed to assure energy
efficiency in state government; and
(7) Any improvements in energy efficiency planned or realized through the use of the LEED rating system, the
Green Globes rating system, ENERGY STAR-qualified products, and guaranteed energy savings performance
contracts.
Section 136. Sections 32 to 40 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Electronic Wills Act.
Section 137. Sections 41 to 55 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Electronic Estate Planning
Documents Act.
Section 138. Sections 59 to 69 of this Act may be cited as the Kentucky Qualified Dispositions in Trust
Act.
Section 139. Sections 70 to 86 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Directed Trust Act.
Section 140. Sections 87 to 114 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Trust Decanting Act.
Section 141. Sections 124 and 125 of this Act take effect January 1, 2028.
Section 142. The following KRS sections are repealed:
395.635 Certification of list of fiduciaries delinquent in accounting -- Notice -- Fees.
386B.8-080 Powers to direct.
386.175 Trustee's power to appoint principal or income in favor of trustee of second trust -- Terms of second trust --
Special fiduciary -- Notice -- Judicial proceedings.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version